Alabama, session 2026rs, HB238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
7 Section 1. There is hereby appropriated for the support
8 of public education in Alabama for the fiscal year ending
9 September 30, 2027, for debt service, and for capital outlay
10 to be paid out of funds specified in subsection (a) of Section
11 2 of this act and the amounts specified in subsections (a),
12 (b), (c), (d), and (e) of Section 3 of this act. For the
13 purpose specified in subsection (b) of Section 2 of this act,
14 amounts are shown by programmatic area and the total for all
15 programs is shown so as to include estimated sources of funds
16 other than those listed in subsection (a) of Section 2 of this
17 act. For the purpose of this act, "ETF" shall mean the
18 Education Trust Fund and "Federal and Local Funds" shall mean
19 all gifts, grants, contributions, or entitlements, including
20 grants by the Congress of the United States, municipalities or
21 counties.
22 Section 2. (a) The appropriations provided for in this
23 act shall be paid from funds in the State Treasury to the
24 credit of the Education Trust Fund, Alabama Peace Officers'
25 Standards and Training Fund, Alabama Head and Spinal Cord
26 Injury Trust Fund, Driver Education and Training Fund, Special
27 Education Catastrophic Fund, Public School Fund and other
Page 1

Education Catastrophic Fund, Public School Fund and other
HB238 Enrolled
28 listed funds and are hereby made for the support of public
29 education in Alabama for the fiscal year ending September 30,
30 2027, and the appropriations herein made shall be subject to
31 the provisions, terms, conditions and limitations of the
32 Budget and Financial Control Act (Code of Alabama 1975,
33 Sections 41-4-80 et seq.), the provisions of the Budget
34 Management Act of 1976 (Code of Alabama 1975, Sections 41-19-1
35 et seq.), and shall be in the amounts hereinafter specified.
36 (b) Amounts shown hereinunder the columns "Other Funds"
37 and "Total" are as set forth for the purpose of establishing
38 amounts estimated to be available by programmatic area from
39 sources other than those listed in subsection (a) of this
40 Section 2, in order, upon consideration of such other funds so
41 estimated to be available, to promote the accountability for
42 an efficient use of funds available, and the same are hereby
43 appropriated by the Legislature. Provided, however, that
44 regardless of the ending date of any pay period which has been
45 or may be established by the Legislature for the payment of
46 salaries of state employees, the entire payment due shall be
47 made from the fiscal year's appropriation in which the pay
48 date falls.
49 (c) All appropriations made in Section 3 shall be at
50 the program level. Any directed expenditure of funds below a
51 program shall be from funds appropriated for the program.
Page 2

program shall be from funds appropriated for the program.
HB238 Enrolled
52 Section 3.
53 Education
54 Trust Fund Other Funds Total
55 A. Legislative Branch:
56 1. Examiners of Public Accounts:
57 (a) Audit Services Program 11,534,850 11,534,850
58 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
59 (1) ETF 11,534,850
60 Total Examiners of Public Accounts 11,534,850 11,534,850
61 The Department of Examiners of Public Accounts is hereby authorized to examine as
62 deemed necessary all appropriations herein made for compliance with the laws of the
63 State of Alabama. Any examination performed shall be in accordance with the
64 provisions of Title 41, Chapter 5A, Code of Alabama 1975.
65 2. Legislative Council:
66 (a) Legislative Operations and 10,000,000 10,000,000
67 Support Program
68 For debt and operations of the new State House.
69 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
70 (1) ETF 10,000,000
71 Total Legislative Council 10,000,000 10,000,000
72 3. Legislative Services Agency:
73 (a) Legislative Operations and 4,228,466 4,228,466
74 Support Program
75 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
76 (1) ETF 4,228,466
77 Total Legislative Services Agency 4,228,466 4,228,466
78 4. Legislature :
79 (a) Legislative Operations and 4,320,480 4,320,480
80 Support Program
81 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
82 (1) ETF 4,320,480
Page 3

(1) ETF 4,320,480
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
83 Total Legislature 4,320,480 4,320,480
84 B. Executive Branch:
85 1. Agriculture and Industries,
86 Department of:
87 (a) Agricultural Development Services 600,000 600,000
88 Program
89 (1) Farm to School Program 600,000
90 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
91 (1) ETF 600,000
92 Total Agriculture and Industries, 600,000 600,000
93 Department of
94 2. American Legion and Auxiliary
95 Scholarships:
96 (a) Financial Assistance Program, 112,500 112,500
97 Estimated
98 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
99 (1) ETF 112,500
100 Total American Legion and Auxiliary 112,500 112,500
101 Scholarships
102 To be expended under the provisions of Sections 16-31-1 through 16-31-4, Code of
103 Alabama 1975.
104 3. Archives and History, Department
105 of:
106 (a) Historical Resources Management 8,129,838 8,129,838
107 Program
108 (1) Men's Hall of Fame 10,000
109 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
110 (1) ETF 8,129,838
111 Total Archives and History, Department 8,129,838 8,129,838
112 of
Page 4

8,129,838 8,129,838
of
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
113 The above appropriation shall be expended to support the educational functions of
114 the Department of Archives and History.
115 4. Arts, State Council on the:
116 (a) Fine Arts Program 10,593,983 1,100,000 11,693,983
117 (1) Alabama Center for the Arts 1,485,000
118 a. Alabama Center for the Arts 668,750
119 Foundation
120 (2) Facilities Grant Program 2,000,000
121 The Council on the Arts may award grants from the facilities grant program
122 for projects that build, renovate, restore, preserve, or enhance arts
123 facilities in Alabama, including performing arts centers, art museums and
124 galleries, multi-purpose arts centers, artist residency facilities, and
125 outdoor performance venues. The Council on the Arts shall emphasize rural
126 assistance with grants, with a preference for entities not receiving grants
127 in the prior year. Eligible entities include: (i) 501(c) (3) nonprofit arts
128 organizations chartered in Alabama, active and in good standing with the
129 Internal Revenue Service and the council; or (ii) an entity of local
130 government. Grant amounts shall not exceed $100,000 to any one entity, with
131 the first two grants being reserved for the Arts Council of the Trussville
132 Area Theater for $75,000 and the Carnegie Visual Arts Center for $100,000.
133 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
134 (1) ETF 10,593,983
135 (2) Federal and Local Funds 1,100,000
136 Total Arts, State Council on the 10,593,983 1,100,000 11,693,983
137 5. Charter School Commission, Alabama
138 Public:
139 (a) Administrative Services Program 1,517,428 29,964,656 31,482,084
140 (1) New Schools for Alabama 400,000
Page 5

(1) New Schools for Alabama 400,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
141 The above appropriation shall be expended for public charter school startup
142 funding grants, which shall be distributed on a competitive basis to
143 high-quality public charter school applicants.
144 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
145 (1) ETF 1,517,428
146 (2) Federal and Local Funds 29,964,656
147 Total Charter School Commission, 1,517,428 29,964,656 31,482,084
148 Alabama Public
149 6. Child Abuse and Neglect Prevention,
150 Department of:
151 (a) Social Services Program 10,159,016 10,159,016
152 In accordance with Sections 26-16-1 et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
153 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
154 (1) ETF-Transfer 10,159,016
155 Total Child Abuse and Neglect 10,159,016 10,159,016
156 Prevention, Department of
157 7. Commerce, Department of:
158 (a) Industrial Development Training 71,147,370 71,147,370
159 Institute Program
160 (1) Industrial Development and 8,880,976
161 Training Program
162 (2) Industrial Training Program - 9,203,743
163 Operations and Maintenance
164 (3) Rural Marketing Program 400,000
165 To feature products from Alabama companies in rural counties.
166 (4) Workforce Development 52,662,651
167 a. Alabama Workforce Training 500,000
168 Center
169 b. Modern Manufacturing Project 1,239,840
Page 6

b. Modern Manufacturing Project 1,239,840
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
170 c. West Alabama Works Center for 1,600,000
171 Modern Manufacturing
172 To provide for the expansion of the program to all workforce regions of the
173 state.
174 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
175 (1) ETF 71,147,370
176 Total Commerce, Department of 71,147,370 71,147,370
Page 7

Total Commerce, Department of 71,147,370 71,147,370
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
177 The funds appropriated for Workforce Development are to be expended for those costs
178 incurred by the State in honoring commitments to pay workforce development costs,
179 including services and other assistance and expenses of recruitment and training of
180 a company's workforce, that are undertaken to induce companies to locate and expand
181 their operations in Alabama (described hereinafter as a "Project") and to develop
182 and implement training, placement and recruitment programs that will improve
183 development and expand the State's workforce. Such costs include, but are not
184 limited to: (i) AIDT operating costs directly related to a Project; (ii) wages and
185 benefits for trainers engaged by AIDT for the purpose of a Project; (iii) costs
186 which the State has agreed to pay under the terms of a Project Agreement with a
187 company that are necessary and reasonable charges incurred by the company or its
188 affiliates for personnel providing training to the company's employees, whether
189 those trainers are employees of the company or its vendors or suppliers, including
190 wages, benefits and travel (domestic and, when necessary, international); (iv) any
191 necessary materials, equipment, manuals, or other relevant training materials; (v)
192 the costs incurred for purchasing or repairing or replacing training tools and
193 equipment; (vi) costs incurred for the purchase or construction and maintenance of
194 training facilities; (vii) travel expenses for prospective and current employees and
195 trainees, including travel, food, lodging, relocation, and other costs necessary and
196 reasonable to enable the company to secure a qualified workforce; and (viii) outside
197 training fees. The above funds appropriated for Workforce Development shall be
198 expended primarily for the training of Alabama residents. It is further the intent
199 that contracts with vendors to provide workforce training shall be inclusive and
200 reflect the racial and gender diversity of the State. The Secretary of the
201 Department of Commerce shall report semi-annually to the Chairs of the Senate
202 Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, the House Ways and Means-Education
203 Committee, the Finance Director, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer any funds
204 allocated for workforce training. Such report shall include a summary of the persons
205 trained and the vendors providing the training. The report shall contain information
206 including the residence, race and gender of the persons trained and of the principal
207 or majority owner of the firm or business contracted with to provide the training
208 services.
Page 8

services.
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
209 8. Community College System Board of
210 Trustees, Alabama :
211 (a) Operations and Maintenance 471,954,885 15,551,821 487,506,706
212 The above appropriation from the Education Trust Fund for Operations and
213 Maintenance shall be distributed as provided below. The remainder shall be
214 distributed to each of the colleges based on a distribution model consistent
215 with the recommendations in the final report of the Alabama Community College
216 Advisory Council on Outcomes-Based Funding, except Marion Military Institute.
217 The below amounts are intended to provide a minimum of $125/FTE to each
218 college based on Fall 2025 figures.
219 (1) Alabama Aviation College 370,000
220 a. Andalusia Program 120,000
221 (2) Bevill State Community College 280,000
222 a. Fayette Campus 70,000
223 b. Hamilton Campus 70,000
224 c. Jasper Campus 70,000
225 d. Sumiton Campus 70,000
226 (3) Bishop State Community College 183,625
227 For building renovation and the welding program at Carver Campus.
228 (4) Coastal Alabama Community 552,125
229 College
230 For the technology and manufacturing program.
231 (5) Calhoun Community College 595,875
232 For the expansion of the Alabama Center for the Arts.
233 (6) Central Alabama Community 265,790
234 College
235 (7) Chattahoochee Valley Community 104,750
236 College
237 For Applied Technology Program/Career Discovery.
Page 9

For Applied Technology Program/Career Discovery.
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
238 (8) Drake State Community 250,000
239 Technical College
240 For campus modifications.
241 (9) Enterprise State Community 250,000
242 College
243 (10) Gadsden State Community 342,500
244 College
245 a. Poultry Technology Center 100,000
246 In partnership with Auburn University.
247 b. For economic development. 242,500
248 (11) Ingram State Technical College 100,000
249 (12) Jefferson State Community 652,625
250 College
251 For the nursing program.
252 (13) Lawson State Community College 240,750
253 For STEM education
254 (14) Lurleen B. Wallace Community 200,000
255 College
256 For Workforce Development.
257 (15) Northeast Alabama Community 200,000
258 College
259 (16) Northwest-Shoals Community 450,000
260 College
261 For the Lauderdale County Workforce Center and Acquisition and Construction
262 Program.
263 (17) Reid State Technical College 30,125
264 (18) Shelton State Community 350,000
265 College
Page 10

350,000
College
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
266 a. Distance Support 100,000
267 b. Facility Modification 250,000
268 (19) Snead State Community College 225,000
269 For the Aeronautics School in Albertville.
270 (20) Southern Union State Community 356,125
271 College
272 (21) Trenholm State Community 213,250
273 College
274 (22) Wallace Community 278,875
275 College-Dothan
276 For the Center for Economic and Workforce Development.
277 (23) Wallace Community 175,000
278 College-Selma
279 For the Excellence in Education to Employment Pipeline.
280 (24) Wallace State Community 427,875
281 College-Hanceville
282 For the Aviation Program.
283 (25) Step increases for 30-year 1,007,581
284 employees
285 (b) Auxiliary Enterprises 15,334,968 15,334,968
286 (c) Restricted Funds 372,557,947 372,557,947
287 (d) Operations and Maintenance for 23,276,380 23,276,380
288 Postsecondary Prison Education
289 (1) Perry County Facility 2,500,000
290 (2) Therapeutic Education 1,999,901
291 (3) LifeTech Institute in 2,000,000
292 Thomasville
293 For operations and maintenance.
Page 11

For operations and maintenance.
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
294 (4) Day Reporting Center pilot 1,000,000
295 program
296 (e) Adult Education Program 14,964,656 10,217,797 25,182,453
297 The allocation of Adult Education funds appropriated herein is restricted to
298 the provision of services to individuals who are receiving benefits under the
299 Adult Education and Family Literacy Act, Title II of the federal Workforce
300 Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014.
301 (f) Special Populations Training 4,725,281 4,725,281
302 The above appropriation shall be expended for education and training programs
303 to prepare individuals designated as special populations, as determined by the
304 Chancellor, for entry into the workforce through pre-employment skills
305 training, and intensive career technical training.
306 (g) Mine Safety Training Program at 375,000 375,000
307 Bevill State Community College
308 (h) Postsecondary Education 19,423,073 22,387,615 41,810,688
309 Department - Administration
310 (1) Property and Capital Purchases 850,000
311 and Improvements
312 (2) Training equipment for the 4,000,000
313 Alabama Centers for Rural
314 Healthcare (one-time)
315 (i) Postsecondary/Tech Colleges - 2,000,000 2,000,000
316 Truck Driver Training
317 The above appropriation from earmarked funds is estimated and shall be
318 expended pursuant to Section 32-5-313, Code of Alabama 1975.
319 (j) Industry Certification 9,640,408 9,640,408
320 Initiatives
Page 12

9,640,408 9,640,408
Initiatives
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
321 Industry Certification Initiatives funds shall be distributed by the Alabama
322 Community College System Board of Trustees. The Chancellor of the Alabama
323 Community College System shall report semi-annually to the Chairs of the
324 Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, the House Ways and
325 Means-Education Committee, the Finance Director, and the Legislative Fiscal
326 Officer any funds expended for industry certification initiatives.
327 (1) Career Coaches 3,079,630
328 (2) Workforce Development 3,750,000
329 Initiatives
330 (k) Marion Military Institute 12,834,349 12,834,349
331 (1) Military Hall of Honor 125,000
332 (l) Alabama Technology Network 6,167,736 6,167,736
333 (1) Workforce Training 503,906
334 (m) Dual Enrollment 54,432,385 10,000,000 64,432,385
335 The remaining appropriation shall be expended at the direction of the
336 Chancellor of the Alabama Community College System to continue, expand, and
337 develop a dual enrollment scholarship program for academic and
338 career-technical education programs. The Chancellor will work with business
339 and industry partners to allocate the funds in a manner consistent with
340 addressing identified needs in the State of Alabama. Such allocations will
341 further and/or accommodate the continuation and expansion of dual enrollment
342 programs.
343 (1) Dual Enrollment Program at 200,000
344 Murphy University Center
345 To be available to students in the state.
346 (n) Science, Technology, Engineering, 900,000 900,000
347 Arts and Math (STEAM) Pilot
348 Project
349 (o) The Women's Foundation of Alabama 750,000 750,000
Page 13

(o) The Women's Foundation of Alabama 750,000 750,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
350 The above appropriation shall be expended to support students in obtaining
351 certifications and post-secondary degrees, to aid in scholarships, support
352 services including transportation, tuition and fees, and academic support
353 services. This appropriation is contingent upon the Women's Foundation of
354 Alabama providing a match of private funding and programmatic supports of
355 $400,000. The Foundation shall file a report no later than December 31, 2027
356 to the Governor and the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and
357 Taxation-Education and the House Ways and Means-Education Committee detailing
358 the costs, benefits, and economic impacts on the Fund.
359 (p) Volunteer EMSP Certifications 125,000 125,000
360 Pursuant to Sections 22-18-60, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
361 (q) Automotive Workforce Training 400,000 400,000
362 Scholarship Program
363 The Board of Trustees of the Alabama Community College System, in consultation
364 with the Alabama Industrial Development and Training Institute, shall
365 establish qualifications for the award of scholarships to high school students
366 and adults enrolled in a state educational program relating to the automotive
367 manufacturing industry and shall further provide for the implementation and
368 administration of the scholarships. Scholarship recipients shall be selected
369 by the Board, in consultation with a scholarship committee, comprised of
370 members of the Board of Directors of the Alabama Automotive Manufacturers
371 Association, from applications submitted to the association. The Board shall
372 file a report with the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and
373 Taxation-Education, the House Ways and Means-Education Committee, the
374 Legislative Fiscal Officer, and the Finance Director on September 30, 2027
375 regarding the total number of scholarships awarded for the Fall term of the
376 2026-2027 academic year and the institution attended by the scholarship
377 recipients. The report shall also include the name of each scholarship
378 recipient and the number of years the recipient has received a scholarship.
379 (r) Distance Learning Program 3,375,000 3,375,000
Page 14

(r) Distance Learning Program 3,375,000 3,375,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
380 (s) Automotive Manufacturing 312,500 312,500
381 Workforce Development Program
382 (t) Smart Career Workforce Project 200,000 200,000
383 The above appropriation shall be expended to promote smart careers, support
384 soft skill development through engagement opportunities for youth, develop and
385 implement an effective smart career awareness campaign for students, parents,
386 and the underemployed; and to implement a national recruitment campaign to
387 attract talent at all levels of experience across high-growth, high demand
388 occupations.
389 (u) ACCS Innovation Center 18,500,000 18,500,000
390 (v) LPN Programs 4,000,000 4,000,000
391 The above appropriation shall be expended to establish new and to support
392 current stand-alone LPN Programs throughout the state. The above appropriation
393 shall not be used to enter into exclusive agreements between community
394 colleges and any single healthcare entity.
395 (w) Career Tech Equipment 10,000,000 10,000,000
396 To provide new or updated equipment for career and technical education
397 programs in order to ensure that programs meet current business and industry
398 standards to provide students with the training and skills necessary to
399 provide a workforce for new, existing, or expanding jobs.
400 (x) Short Term Credential Scholarship 1,000,000 1,000,000
401 Program
402 To provide scholarships to Alabama residents enrolling in short-term
403 credential programs within the Alabama Community College System. Eligible
404 students may receive a grant of up to $4,500 to cover qualifying educational
405 expenses, including tuition, fees, books, and supplies necessary for the
406 short-term credential program.
407 (y) Alabama Career Roadmap 2,000,000 2,000,000
408 (z) Cyber Technology and AI Expansion 1,000,000 1,000,000
409 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
410 (1) ETF 660,356,653
Page 15

(1) ETF 660,356,653
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
411 (2) Federal and Other Funds 436,050,148
412 (3) ACS Truck Driver Fund 2,000,000
413 (4) Dual Enrollment Tax Credit Fund 10,000,000
414 Total Community College System Board of 660,356,653 448,050,148 1,108,406,801
415 Trustees, Alabama
416 (1) The allocations as set forth above shall be distributed by the Alabama Community
417 College System Board of Trustees through the Office of the Chancellor.
418
419 (2) The Chancellor of the Alabama Community College System shall report
420 semi-annually to the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and
421 Taxation-Education, the House Ways and Means-Education Committee, the Finance
422 Director, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer any funds expended for the Alabama
423 Technology Network.
424
425 9. Cyber Technology and Engineering,
426 Alabama School of:
427 (a) Operations and Maintenance 16,340,638 914,936 17,255,574
428 (1) Accel Program 929,000
429 For statewide cyber education in K-12 schools as provided in Section
430 16-26D-6, Code of Alabama 1975.
431 (2) Alabama Cyber Range 875,000
432 For a virtual on-demand cybersecurity training platform available to K-12
433 schools statewide.
434 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
435 (1) ETF 16,340,638
436 (2) Federal and Local Funds 914,936
437 Total Cyber Technology and Engineering, 16,340,638 914,936 17,255,574
438 Alabama School of
439 10. Debt Service:
440 (a) Payments on Endowments 81,880 81,880
Page 16

(a) Payments on Endowments 81,880 81,880
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
441 Payments on endowments shall be as provided below.
442 (1) Auburn University Endowment, 20,280
443 For interest on
444 (2) Grove Hill Endowment, For 600
445 interest on
446 (3) University of Alabama 61,000
447 Endowment, For interest on
448 (b) Interest on Public School Fund 532,864 532,864
449 Endowment
450 Interest on Public School Fund Endowment shall be as provided below.
451 (1) 16th Section Lands 410,000
452 (Estimated), Interest on
453 (2) James Wallace Fund, Interest 275
454 on
455 (3) School Indemnity Lands 90,000
456 (Estimated), Interest on
457 (4) Surplus Revenue, Interest on 26,764
458 (5) Valueless 16th Section Land, 5,825
459 Interest on
460 (c) General Obligation Bonds, 27,165,423 27,165,423
461 Estimated
462 The above appropriation shall be used to pay debt service on the following
463 General Obligation Bonds: Series 2016-A, Series 2016-C, Series 2018-A, and
464 Series 2018-B. In the event any of the above bonds are refunded or new General
465 Obligation bonds are issued, debt service on these newly issued bonds may be
466 paid from the appropriations made above from the Education Trust Fund
467 contingent upon the recommendation of the Director of Finance and the approval
468 of the Governor.
469 (d) Alabama Incentives Financing 3,855,833 3,855,833
470 Authority Bonds, Estimated
Page 17

3,855,833 3,855,833
Authority Bonds, Estimated
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
471 The above appropriation shall be used to pay debt service on the following
472 Alabama Incentives Financing Authority Bonds: Series 2009-B, Series 2019-A,
473 and Series 2019-B. In the event any of the above bonds are refunded or new
474 Alabama Incentives Financing Authority bonds are issued, debt service on these
475 newly issued bonds may be paid from the appropriations made above from the
476 Education Trust Fund contingent upon the recommendation of the Director of
477 Finance and the approval of the Governor.
478 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
479 (1) ETF 31,103,136
480 (2) ETF-Transfer 532,864
481 Total Debt Service 31,636,000 31,636,000
482 11. Dental Scholarship Awards, Board
483 of:
484 (a) Support of Other Educational 871,166 2,722,000 3,593,166
485 Activities Program
486 To be expended under the provisions of Sections 16-47-76 through 16-47-81,
487 Code of Alabama 1975.
488 (1) Alabama Dental Service Program 500,000
489 As set out in Sections 16-47-77 through 16-47-81, Code of Alabama 1975.
490 (2) Alabama Rural Dental Health 140,000
491 Scholars Program
492 As set out in Section 16-47-76, Code of Alabama 1975.
493 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
494 (1) ETF 871,166
495 (2) Dental Scholarship Awards Fund 2,722,000
496 Total Dental Scholarship Awards, Board 871,166 2,722,000 3,593,166
497 of
498 12. Early Childhood Education,
499 Department of:
500 (a) Social Services Program 226,595,637 22,711,178 249,306,815
Page 18

(a) Social Services Program 226,595,637 22,711,178 249,306,815
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
501 (1) Dolly Parton Imagination 3,100,000
502 Library
503 (2) Home Instruction for Parents 5,000,000
504 of Preschool Youngsters
505 (HIPPY)/First Teacher Home
506 Visiting Program
507 (3) Marketing Campaign for Alabama 375,000
508 Family Central
509 (4) Office of School Readiness 209,866,459
510 Any waiver provided to a First Class Pre-K classroom that was funded by this
511 program for the 2025-2026 school year shall continue for the 2026-2027
512 school year.
513 (5) Operations and Maintenance 3,123,484
514 (6) Strong Start/Strong Finish 4,755,694
515 (7) VOICES for Alabama's Children 375,000
516 (b) Children's Policy Council Program 4,497,679 4,497,679
517 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
518 (1) ETF 226,595,637
519 (2) Federal and Local Funds 22,711,178
520 (3) Children's Policy Council Fund 4,497,679
521 Total Early Childhood Education, 226,595,637 27,208,857 253,804,494
522 Department of
Page 19

226,595,637 27,208,857 253,804,494
Department of
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
523 It is the intent of the Legislature that the above appropriation for the Strong
524 Start/Strong Finish initiative be used to expand the Pre-K-3rd approach to learning
525 and will incorporate the most successful parts of Pre-K-3rd initiatives in order to
526 establish a strong foundation of early learning experiences that promotes student
527 achievement and success. It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department
528 notify the members of each local legislative delegation (whenever possible) prior to
529 grants being awarded in each legislative district. The Department shall notify the
530 legislative delegation of the amount of the grant, the recipient of the grant and
531 the date the grant is awarded.
532 13. Economic and Community Affairs,
533 Alabama Department of:
534 (a) Research and Development Grant 5,000,000 5,000,000
535 Program
536 The Department shall be eligible for an administrative fee not to exceed two
537 and one-half percent (2.5%) of the sum appropriated herein.
538 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
539 (1) ETF-Transfer 5,000,000
540 Total Economic and Community Affairs, 5,000,000 5,000,000
541 Alabama Department of
542 14. Education, State Board of Local
543 Boards of Education:
544 (a) Foundation Program 4,980,632,098 966,148,885 5,946,780,983
545 These funds shall be allocated to each LEA with the requirement that each step
546 of each salary schedule for each class and type of employee provides an hourly
547 rate of not less than $15 per hour, based upon the number of contract days and
548 number of hours per day required by the job description for that class and
549 type of employee.
550
551 (1) Alabama Student Information 13,839,874
552 Management System
Page 20

13,839,874
Management System
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
553 For the conversion and modernization of the Alabama Student Information
554 Management System (ASIMS). ASIMS will allow the continued support and
555 maintenance of the Information Management System which permits each local
556 Education Agency and the State Department of Education to comply with all
557 state and federal accountability standards and reporting obligations. These
558 funds shall be expended for the State Department of Education's Fiscal Year
559 2027 costs for implementation of the new ASIMS.
560 (b) Transportation Program 586,223,642 586,223,642
561 The rate per day for two personal days and five sick days for transportation
562 personnel shall be $50. The State Department of Education shall develop a plan
563 to fund and replace school buses that have been in service for more than ten
564 years. The plan shall take into consideration the age and mileage of eligible
565 buses and the number of eligible buses that run morning and afternoon routes.
566 The Department shall provide a copy of the plan to the Chair of the House Ways
567 and Means-Education Committee, the Chair of the Senate Committee on Finance
568 and Taxation-Education, the Finance Director, and the Legislative Fiscal
569 Officer by the 5th legislative day of the 2027 Regular Session.
570 (c) Endowment Interest Program-Public 532,864 532,864
571 School Fund, Estimated
572 (d) Public School Fund, Estimated 215,000,000 215,000,000
573 Notwithstanding Section 16-13-234, Code of Alabama 1975, the local boards of
574 education shall request waivers to spend Public School Funds appropriated in
575 this Act, after the payment of pledged debt service or obligated capital
576 projects, for other operating expenses.
577 (e) Board of Adjustment 50,000 50,000
578 (f) School Nurses Program 96,448,015 96,448,015
Page 21

(f) School Nurses Program 96,448,015 96,448,015
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
579 To be distributed so that each school system shall receive one nurse and an
580 additional nurse or fractions of a nursing allocation based upon the average
581 daily membership during the first 20 scholastic days after Labor Day of the
582 preceding school year. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide funding
583 to allow each school to have a school nurse by fiscal year 2029. The School
584 Nurses Program shall use the following salary matrix to determine nursing
585 salaries, based on 187 contract days, with school nurses paid based upon their
586 years of public-school nurse experience and highest degree earned. The pay of
587 any part-time employee shall conform to the pro-rata share of the following
588 matrix:
589
590
591 STE LPN RN-ASN RN-BSN RN-MSN RN-DNP
592 P
593
594 0 34,609 45,660 49,235 53,090 57,247
595 1 34,609 45,660 49,235 53,090 57,247
596 2 34,609 45,660 49,235 53,090 57,247
597 3 38,066 50,221 54,152 58,393 62,965
598 4 38,066 50,221 54,152 58,393 62,965
599 5 38,066 50,221 54,152 58,393 62,965
Page 22

5 38,066 50,221 54,152 58,393 62,965
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
600 6 39,735 52,422 56,527 60,954 65,726
601 7 39,735 52,422 56,527 60,954 65,726
602 8 39,735 52,422 56,527 60,954 65,726
603 9 40,934 54,005 58,234 62,794 67,710
604 10 41,343 54,545 58,816 63,421 68,386
605 11 41,756 55,090 59,403 64,055 69,070
606 12 42,174 55,641 59,999 64,696 69,762
607 13 42,596 56,198 60,598 65,344 70,459
608 14 43,023 56,760 61,205 65,997 71,164
609 15 43,454 57,329 61,817 66,657 71,876
610 16 43,887 57,901 62,435 67,324 72,594
611 17 44,327 58,480 63,059 67,997 73,320
612 18 44,769 59,065 63,689 68,676 74,054
Page 23

18 44,769 59,065 63,689 68,676 74,054
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
613 19 45,217 59,655 64,326 69,363 74,794
614 20 45,668 60,252 64,968 70,056 75,542
615 21 46,126 60,855 65,619 70,758 76,298
616 22 46,587 61,463 66,274 71,464 77,059
617 23 47,053 62,078 66,938 72,179 77,831
618 24 47,523 62,699 67,608 72,902 78,610
619 25 47,999 63,325 68,283 73,630 79,395
620 26 48,478 63,958 68,966 74,366 80,189
621 27 48,964 64,598 69,657 75,110 80,992
622 28 49,453 65,244 70,353 75,861 81,800
623 29 49,948 65,897 71,056 76,620 82,619
624 30 50,447 66,555 71,766 77,385 83,445
625 31 50,952 67,221 72,484 78,159 84,279
Page 24

31 50,952 67,221 72,484 78,159 84,279
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
626 32 51,462 67,894 73,210 78,941 85,123
627 33 51,976 68,572 73,940 79,730 85,973
628 34 52,495 69,257 74,680 80,526 86,833
629 35 53,020 69,950 75,426 81,333 87,701
630
631 (g) Information Technology Services 23,779,178 23,779,178
632 Program
633 The above appropriation shall be expended by local school systems towards the
634 position of a District Technology Director that meets the job description and
635 qualifications established by Section 16-22-20, Code of Alabama 1975.
636 (1) Alabama Leaders in Educational 150,000
637 Technology (ALET)
638 The Department shall consult with the Alabama Leaders in Educational
639 Technology (ALET) to implement this allocation, and to assist school
640 systems' effective use of these funds, including but not limited to,
641 conducting workshops, training, and collaborative support for cybersecurity.
642 The above appropriation shall be directed to Alabama Leaders in Educational
643 Technology (ALET) to assist school systems' effective use of these funds,
644 including but not limited to, conducting workshops, training, and
645 collaborative support for cybersecurity.
646 (2) Cybersecurity Improvement 12,051,980
Page 25

(2) Cybersecurity Improvement 12,051,980
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
647 The above appropriation shall be used to improve cybersecurity, including
648 protection of data and infrastructure. The State Department of Education
649 shall allocate this portion of the appropriation with $68,000 for each local
650 education agency, plus $2.00 per student for each student over 1,000 in
651 districts with 1,000 or more students, including the Alabama Institute for
652 Deaf and Blind, the Alabama School for Math and Science, the Alabama School
653 of Fine Arts, the Alabama School of Cyber Technology and Engineering, the
654 Alabama School of Healthcare Sciences, and the Department of Youth Services
655 through applications submitted to the Department. Allocations shall be used
656 to fund network administration and/or technology that sustains, complements,
657 upgrades, or augments current security measures.
658 Any cybersecurity funds not awarded to school systems shall be directed to
659 the Alabama Leaders in Educational Technology to fund programs or pilots to
660 improve the cybersecurity of Alabama's K-12 public school systems.
661
662
663 (h) Career Tech Operations and 10,000,000 10,000,000
664 Maintenance
665 (i) Start-up Charter Schools 2,000,000 2,000,000
666 The above appropriation includes funds for start-up and/or conversion of
667 public charter schools which shall be funded at Foundation Program cost per
668 unit in the same manner as other public K-12 schools.
669 (j) Math and Science Teacher Program 81,000,000 81,000,000
Page 26

(j) Math and Science Teacher Program 81,000,000 81,000,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
670 To be distributed to school systems based on the provisions of Article 15
671 of Chapter 13 of Title 16 of the Code of Alabama 1975. The Math and Science
672 Teacher Program shall use the following salary matrix to determine the
673 salaries of qualified math and science teachers, based on 189 contract days.
674 In addition to the following salaries, qualified math and science teachers
675 employed in hard-to-staff schools shall receive an additional $5,000 stipend.
676
677 Step Bachelor Master AA/EDS Doctor
678
679 0 51,532 58,431 62,573 66,714
680
681 1 55,164 63,438 68,403 73,371
682
683 2 58,112 66,825 72,075 77,285
684
685 3 59,811 68,782 74,185 79,548
686
687 4 61,557 70,790 76,349 81,869
688
689 5 63,348 72,849 78,571 84,252
690
691 6 65,188 74,963 80,853 86,697
692
Page 27

80,853
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
693 7 67,075 77,135 83,193 89,208
694
695 8 68,416 78,675 84,857 90,993
696
697 9 69,784 80,250 86,554 92,813
698
699 10 70,829 81,455 87,851 94,204
700
701 11 71,892 82,677 89,170 95,616
702
703 12 72,971 83,917 90,506 97,051
704
705 13 72,971 83,917 90,506 97,051
706
707 14 72,971 83,917 90,506 97,051
708
709 15 74,069 85,181 91,871 98,513
710
711 16 74,069 85,181 91,871 98,513
712
Page 28

16
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
713 17 74,069 85,181 91,871 98,513
714
715 18 75,192 86,470 93,261 100,004
716
717 19 75,192 86,470 93,261 100,004
718
719 20 75,192 86,470 93,261 100,004
720
721 21 76,335 87,787 94,680 101,526
722
723 22 76,335 87,787 94,680 101,526
724
725 23 76,335 87,787 94,680 101,526
726
727 24 77,501 89,126 96,126 103,078
728
729 25 77,501 89,126 96,126 103,078
730
731 26 77,501 89,126 96,126 103,078
732
Page 29

26
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
733 27 78,691 90,496 97,602 104,660
734
735
736 (k) Parental Leave 9,600,000 9,600,000
737 The Alabama State Department of Education will reimburse each LEA for each day
738 of approved leave pursuant to Code of Alabama 1975, §41-22-6, based on the
739 daily substitute teacher rate specified in the annual education budget.
740 (l) RAISE Act Program 58,000,000 133,000,000 191,000,000
Page 30

(l) RAISE Act Program 58,000,000 133,000,000 191,000,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
741 To be distributed to school systems pursuant to Section 16-13-362, Code of
742 Alabama 1975. In fiscal year 2027, if any LEA has a poverty, English language
743 learner, or gifted student group whose calculated weighted allocation below is
744 less than the LEA’s allocation through the relevant grant programs
745 consolidated into the RAISE Fund (Local Boards At-Risk, English Learners Grant
746 Program, Gifted Students Program), then they shall receive the same amount of
747 funding as they did in fiscal year 2026. The RAISE Act Program allocations to
748 school systems for fiscal year 2027 shall be based on a Base Funding Factor of
749 $7,829 per student and the following weights:
750
751
752 Student Group: Weighted Allocation:
753 Students in Poverty 2.75%
754 Special Education:
755
756 Tier 1: Specific Learning 2.5%
757 Disability, Speech/Language
758 Impairment, Other Health
759 Impairment
760 Tier 2: Autism Spectrum Disorder, 10%
761 Intellectual Disability,
762 Developmental Disability, Multiple
763 Disabilities
764 Tier 3: Emotional Disturbance or 75%
765 Disability, Hearing Impairment,
Page 31

75%
Disability, Hearing Impairment,
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
766 Orthopedic Impairment, Visual
767 Impairment, Deaf-Blindness,
768 Traumatic Brain Injury
769 English Language Learners 7% with 10% for concentrated (over
770 9% ADM)
771 Gifted Students 4.75% (5% ADM)
772 Charter School Students attending 2%
773 an eligible charter school
774 physically located in school
775 system with a B, C, D, or F grade
776 on the latest Alabama Education
777 Report Card pursuant to Chapter
778 6C, Title 16, Code of Alabama
779 1975
780
781
782 (m) Special Education Teacher Stipend 7,904,000 7,904,000
783 The above appropriation includes funds to pay salary supplements of $1,200 and
784 related benefit costs for each classroom Special Education Teacher, including
785 the Alabama Institute for Deaf and Blind and the Youth Services School
786 District.
787 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
788 (1) ETF 5,716,636,933
789 (2) ETF-Transfer 139,000,000
790 (3) Federal and Local Funds 966,148,885
791 (4) Public School Fund, Estimated 215,532,864
792 (5) RAISE Fund 133,000,000
Page 32

(5) RAISE Fund 133,000,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
793 Total Education, State Board of Local 5,855,636,933 1,314,681,749 7,170,318,682
794 Boards of Education
Page 33

5,855,636,933 1,314,681,749 7,170,318,682
Boards of Education
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
795 Upon certification and approval by the Deputy State Superintendent of the Office of
796 Administrative and Financial Services that any newly formed city school system is an
797 operational public school system within the State of Alabama, the Department shall
798 ensure that any Foundation Program funds or other state funds allocated to the
799 parent county board of education of the newly formed city school system for students
800 that attended and were counted in the Average Daily Membership of the parent county
801 board of education and now will attend the newly formed city school system shall be
802 transferred to the newly formed city school system for operational expenses. The
803 above appropriation shall be distributed by the State Board of Education in
804 accordance with the provisions of Sections 16-13-230 through 16-13-239, Code of
805 Alabama 1975, and all other laws and regulations of the State Board of Education
806 relating to the expenditure of such funds. These funds shall be used to provide a
807 minimum school term of 180 full instructional days, or the hourly equivalent
808 thereof, and for equitable educational opportunities in the public schools of the
809 State. It is the intent of the Legislature that local boards of education allocate
810 state and federal funding to conversion charter schools as required by law. It is
811 further the intent of the Legislature that funds appropriated from the Education
812 Trust Fund shall not be used to pay membership dues to any organization/association.
813 Foundation Program calculations for fiscal year 2026-2027 are based on the funding
814 divisors set forth below. Units earned under the Foundation Program shall be
815 employed as regular classroom teachers and assigned by the local board of education.
816 The divisors listed below shall not serve to prescribe pupil-teacher ratios. It is
817 the intent of the Legislature that local boards of education have flexibility in
818 determining where reductions are made. Any reductions made using flexibility of
819 state units must comply with federal comparability and supplanting guidelines. Each
820 district will submit an application for approval by the State Superintendent as to
821 the unit allocation adjustments requested.
822
823 Grades K-3: 14.25
824 Grades 4-6: 20.06
825 Grades 7-8: 19.34
826 Grades 9-12: 17.95
Page 34

Grades 9-12: 17.95
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
827
828 In allocating the funds in the Foundation Program, the State Board of Education
829 shall allot funds based on the rates established as follows:
830 The Foundation Program shall use the following salary matrix to determine the cost
831 of instructional salaries, based on 187 contract days, and any part-time contract
832 shall conform to the pro-rata share of the following matrix:
833
834 Years BS MS 6Y DO ND
835 Experience
836
837
838 0 48,552 52,913 57,055 61,195 48,552
839
840 1 48,552 52,913 57,055 61,195 48,552
841
842 2 48,552 52,913 57,055 61,195 48,552
843
844 3 50,609 58,200 62,755 67,317 50,609
845
846 4 50,609 58,200 62,755 67,317 50,609
847
848 5 50,609 58,200 62,755 67,317 50,609
849
Page 35

HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
850 6 52,828 60,750 65,522 70,259 52,828
851
852 7 52,828 60,750 65,522 70,259 52,828
853
854 8 52,828 60,750 65,522 70,259 52,828
855
856 9 54,424 62,586 67,501 72,382 54,424
857
858 10 54,966 63,211 68,175 73,105 54,966
859
860 11 55,517 63,843 68,857 73,835 55,517
861
862 12 56,072 64,482 69,545 74,574 56,072
863
864 13 56,633 65,125 70,242 75,319 56,633
865
866 14 57,199 65,777 70,943 76,073 57,199
867
868 15 57,771 66,436 71,653 76,834 57,771
869
Page 36

15
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
870 16 58,349 67,099 72,369 77,602 58,349
871
872 17 58,932 67,770 73,094 78,378 58,932
873
874 18 59,522 68,448 73,825 79,161 59,522
875
876 19 60,116 69,132 74,564 79,952 60,116
877
878 20 60,718 69,824 75,308 80,753 60,718
879
880 21 61,325 70,522 76,062 81,561 61,325
881
882 22 61,938 71,228 76,821 82,376 61,938
883
884 23 62,557 71,939 77,590 83,199 62,557
885
886 24 63,183 72,659 78,366 84,031 63,183
887
888 25 63,815 73,385 79,149 84,872 63,815
889
Page 37

25
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
890 26 64,452 74,119 79,941 85,720 64,452
891
892 27 65,098 74,860 80,741 86,578 65,098
893
894 28 65,749 75,609 81,547 87,443 65,749
895
896 29 66,407 76,365 82,363 88,318 66,407
897
898 30 67,070 77,129 83,187 89,202 67,070
899
900 31 67,741 77,900 84,019 90,092 67,741
901
902 32 68,419 78,679 84,859 90,994 68,419
903
904 33 69,102 79,466 85,708 91,905 69,102
905
906 34 69,793 80,260 86,565 92,824 69,793
907
908 35 70,492 81,063 87,430 93,751 70,492
909
910 Professional learning activities are sustained, intensive, collaborative,
Page 38

Professional learning activities are sustained, intensive, collaborative,
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
911 job-embedded, data-driven, and classroom-focused to provide educators with the
912 knowledge and skills necessary to enable students to succeed and meet the
913 challenging state academic standards. At least fifty percent of all professional
914 learning requirements necessary to retain a valid Alabama teaching certificate shall
915 be directly related to the knowledge and skills necessary to provide high quality
916 instruction that leads to student development and academic growth. The State Board
917 of Education may adopt rules, as necessary, for initial or recertification criteria.
918 The State Superintendent shall provide a status report on the approval system status
919 and budgetary needs to the Chairs of the House Ways and Means-Education and Senate
920 Finance and Taxation-Education Committees on a semi-annual basis.
921
922 Notwithstanding Section 16-13-231.1(d), Code of Alabama 1975, there shall not be an
923 appropriation for the 1% over the total cost of instructional salaries for the
924 Foundation Program as calculated by the State Minimum Salary Schedule for the fiscal
925 year beginning October 1, 2026. For "Fringe Benefits" the rate per day for two
926 personal days and five sick days (for units earned in the Foundation Program) shall
927 be $120. The Teachers' Retirement System employer rate shall be 14.66% of salaries
928 for Tier I members and 13.70% of salaries for Tier II members. The Public Education
929 Employees' Health Insurance Program (PEEHIP) rate shall be $1,048 per month for each
930 full-time employee. As funds are appropriated, the appropriation herein shall
931 include funds to pay for substitute support employees for each day a support
932 employee is absent.
933
934 For "Classroom Instructional Support," the uniform amounts used in determining the
935 Foundation Program allowance for classroom instructional support shall be: (1)
936 textbooks or digital resources at $100.00 per pupil in average daily membership
937 during the first 20 scholastic days after Labor Day of the preceding school year;
938 (2) classroom materials and supplies at $1,000.00 per unit earned in the Foundation
939 Program; (3) technology at $500.00 per unit earned in the Foundation Program; (4)
940 professional development at $100.00 per unit earned in the Foundation Program; and
941 (5) library enhancement at $157.72 per unit earned in the Foundation Program. 100%
942 of funds allocated for classroom materials and supplies shall be used for
Page 39

of funds allocated for classroom materials and supplies shall be used for
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
943 in-classroom expenses. Funds for classroom materials and supplies shall not be used
944 to maintain, repair, or replace technology equipment or devices, or other
945 instructional material that is mandated by the State Department of Education, and is
946 used in the classroom to provide instruction to students. Funds allocated for
947 instructional support units to meet Advanced Education standards may be used for
948 principals, assistant principals, counselors, and librarians as calculated by the
949 State Department of Education and assigned to the schools where such units are
950 earned. An instructional support unit earned for a principal shall be increased by
951 .31 for elementary schools, .35 for middle schools, and .45 for secondary schools
952 and unit schools. For assistant principals, an instructional support unit earned
953 shall be 0.5 FTE for elementary schools with an ADM of 300-499.99 and 1.0 FTE for
954 middle schools with an ADM of 300-499.99. An instructional support unit earned for a
955 counselor shall be increased by .03 for secondary schools and unit schools. The
956 budgeting and expenditure of funds in the Foundation Program at the local level
957 shall be determined and made by the local board of education in accordance with
958 rules and regulations of the State Board of Education and all laws governing such
959 school budgets and expenditures.
960
961 15. Education, State Department of:
962 (a) Administrative Services Program 576,654,152 65,550,183 642,204,335
963 (1) Advancement Placement 13,500,000
964 The above appropriation may support the programmatic work of A+ Education
965 Partnership to expand access to Advanced Placement (AP) courses and rigorous
966 curricula in preceding grades by providing educator training, equipment,
967 incentives, and ongoing support to teachers and students. Subject to
968 appropriations, it is the intent of the Legislature that the State
969 Department of Education may also provide funds to pay for the AP exam fees
970 for Alabama students eligible to receive free or reduced lunch.
971 (2) Alabama Holocaust Commission 150,000
Page 40

(2) Alabama Holocaust Commission 150,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
972 (3) Alabama Math, Science and 159,128,318
973 Technology Initiative -
974 Operations and Maintenance
975 From the above appropriation, the State Superintendent of Education shall
976 direct Alabama Math, Science and Technology Initiative Program (AMSTI)
977 resources to the districts based on their individual needs. This
978 appropriation shall not be transferred and must be expended in accordance
979 with the intent of the appropriation to each of the AMSTI sites. It is the
980 intent of the Legislature that funds appropriated for AMSTI be divided based
981 upon the number of classroom teachers served by in-service centers and
982 expended only for AMSTI through established procedures of the most recent
983 year's contractual agreement of each site within the regional in-service
984 center regions. The State Superintendent of Education shall report
985 semi-annually to the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and
986 Taxation-Education, the House Ways and Means-Education Committee, the
987 Permanent Joint Legislative Committee on Finances and Budgets, the Finance
988 Director, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer the expenditures for AMSTI.
989 Such report shall include, but not be limited to, the amounts expended for
990 the equipment, materials and supplies needed to teach math and science, as
991 well as the amounts expended for professional development and on-site
992 support. The report shall also include information regarding the
993 effectiveness of the initiative in improving math and science test scores
994 for K-12 students. No money appropriated for the Alabama Reading Initiative
995 or AMSTI may be repurposed by the State Superintendent of Education for any
996 other purpose other than those already established herein.
997 a. Alabama Numeracy Act 114,000,000
Page 41

a. Alabama Numeracy Act 114,000,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
998 To be expended in accordance with Title 16, Chapter 6H, Code of Alabama
999 1975. An education task force that is responsible for vendor evaluations for
1000 the Numeracy Act shall provide all notes, scoring sheets, and rubrics to the
1001 Department of Education and the Department shall make this information
1002 available to vendors upon request post-award.
1003 b. Data Literacy 2,629,000
1004 The above appropriation shall be expended in collaboration with Quant Hub.
1005 c. Saban Center 2,000,000
1006 It is the intent of the Legislature that funds be utilized for teacher
1007 training, professional development, and teacher internships at the Saban
1008 Center as agreed to by the State Department of Education, in support of
1009 mathematics and science goals established by the Department. Teachers should
1010 be selected from a variety of schools, with a strategic emphasis to include
1011 those in the Black Belt Region and/or with a large percentage of
1012 economically disadvantaged students.
1013 d. Early Childhood Classroom 1,700,000
1014 Assessment
1015 (4) Alabama Reading Initiative - 151,950,000
1016 Operations and Maintenance
Page 42

151,950,000
Operations and Maintenance
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1017 It is the intent of the Legislature that funds appropriated for the Alabama
1018 Reading Initiative be expended only for the Alabama Reading Initiative
1019 Program. The State Superintendent of Education shall report semi-annually to
1020 the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, the
1021 House Ways and Means-Education Committee, the Permanent Joint Legislative
1022 Committee on Finances and Budgets, the Finance Director, and the Legislative
1023 Fiscal Officer, the expenditures for the Alabama Reading Initiative Program.
1024 Such report shall include, but not be limited to, the specific amounts
1025 expended for professional development, a summary and evaluation of summer
1026 and afterschool programming across the state, and on-site support for school
1027 coaches and support staff for Alabama Reading Initiative purposes only. The
1028 remaining funds shall be expended for any of the following: for the
1029 employment of state and regional level reading specialists, for professional
1030 development and technical assistance to schools, to supplement the costs of
1031 local reading coaches, summer enrichment programs, incentives for schools
1032 demonstrating the most growth in grade 3 reading achievement, or other
1033 purposes to improve K-3 literacy. The remaining funds appropriated herein
1034 shall be expended in accordance with the general provisions of the Alabama
1035 Literacy Act, Chapter 6G of Title 16. The State Superintendent of Education
1036 shall ensure these funds target the lowest performing schools. An education
1037 task force that is responsible for vendor evaluations for the Alabama
1038 Literacy Act shall provide all notes, scoring sheets, and rubrics to the
1039 Department of Education and the Department shall make this information
1040 available to vendors upon request post-award.
1041 a. K-3 Reading Coaches 36,800,000
Page 43

a. K-3 Reading Coaches 36,800,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1042 A minimum of the amount above shall be allocated directly to local boards of
1043 education for the employment of reading coaches to work in grades K-3. At a
1044 minimum, $80,000 shall be distributed to each local board of education for
1045 the employment of a full time reading coach. The remaining funds shall be
1046 distributed to each local board of education pro-rata based on the number of
1047 K-3 schools and/or students as determined by the State Department of
1048 Education. All funds are to be distributed and expended for reading coaches
1049 to serve grades K, 1, 2, and 3 only.
1050 b. Certified Academic Language 600,000
1051 Therapist (CALT) Stipend
1052 Program
Page 44

600,000
Program
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1053 The above appropriation includes funds to pay salary supplements and related
1054 benefit costs for Certified Academic Language Therapists (CALT) and other
1055 costs of the program. Supplement amounts will be determined by the
1056 availability of funds based on the number of CALT Teachers. The state of
1057 Alabama will provide an annual supplement of $5,000 to any CALT that is
1058 employed full-time in a public K-12 school system or public independent
1059 school and is properly certified by the state of Alabama. The existing
1060 eligibility criteria will apply: (a) CALTs employed on less than a full-time
1061 contract on October 1 will receive a pro-rata share of the salary
1062 supplement. (b) CALTs employed full-time after October 1 will receive a
1063 pro-rata share of the salary supplement. (c) Any CALT employed full-time in
1064 Alabama and properly certified by the state of Alabama will receive the
1065 annual salary stipend. (d) CALTs employed as a substitute are not eligible
1066 for the salary supplement. (e) CALTs who are on leave of absence for more
1067 than half a school year will receive a prorated amount based on the number
1068 of months worked during the school year. (f) CALTs will receive the salary
1069 supplement each year of the valid period of the CALT credentials unless the
1070 Alabama Legislature declines to make the annual appropriation. (g) CALTs
1071 must maintain their CALT credentials in order to continue receiving the
1072 salary supplement. (h) CALTs employed in the final year of their CALT
1073 credentials valid period will receive a prorated amount based on the number
1074 of months worked covered in that valid period. (i) CALTs who leave after
1075 October 1 will be eligible for a prorated amount based on the months served.
1076 (j) CALTs must remain employed with a public K-12 Local Board of Education
1077 school system or public independent school to continue receiving the salary
1078 supplement.
1079 c. Early Childhood Classroom 1,700,000
1080 Assessment
1081 (5) Alabama Summer and Afterschool 17,286,000
1082 Program
Page 45

17,286,000
Program
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1083 Of the above appropriation, $17,200,000 shall be expended for the Alabama
1084 Summer and Afterschool Program (ASAP) grants program with the objective of
1085 reducing the achievement gap in students who are not proficient in reading
1086 and/or math.
1087 The State Superintendent of Education shall administer the grants process.
1088 Grants shall be awarded to a) local education agencies, municipalities, and
1089 not-for-profit organizations for summer and afterschool programs that
1090 provide direct services and b) to entities that provide support to summer
1091 and after-school programs. Afterschool programs shall be guided by the
1092 Alabama Afterschool Quality Standards; summer programs shall be guided by
1093 the "Final Report and Recommendations" of the Alabama Campaign for
1094 Grade-Level Reading, Pages 81-92.
1095 Data on student and program outcomes shall be collected and used to inform a
1096 continuous improvement process. A report shall be provided to the
1097 Legislature listing grantees and summarizing outcomes.
1098 The intent of the Legislature is to increase access to evidence-based,
1099 high-quality summer and afterschool programming, to build a diverse delivery
1100 model of providers, and to foster collaboration between local education
1101 agencies and community-based organizations. The goal is to award at least
1102 60% of the funding to nonprofit, community based organizations or
1103 partnerships between community-based organizations and local education
1104 agencies.
1105
1106
1107 (6) Arts Education 2,100,000
1108 (7) Better Basics 500,000
1109 For reading and math instruction and resources to the educationally
1110 vulnerable.
1111 (8) Children First Trust Fund 3,050,000
Page 46

(8) Children First Trust Fund 3,050,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1112 The above appropriation will be directed by the State Department of
1113 Education towards the specialized treatment of students with autism,
1114 students with emotional disabilities and students with deficit disorders.
1115 The Department may also allocate funds to each local educational agency as a
1116 supplemental appropriation based upon the number of students with
1117 identifiable disabilities.
1118 (9) Children's Eye Screening 2,896,460
1119 Program and Follow-up Eye Care
1120 Vendors shall file a report on or before December 31, 2026 with the Chairs
1121 of the House Ways and Means-Education Committee, the Senate Committee on
1122 Finance and Taxation-Education, the Finance Director, and the Legislative
1123 Fiscal Officer. Children identified as uninsured or underinsured shall be
1124 provided with free eye exams and free prescription spectacles. A database
1125 including specific data by child, grade, school/system, and services for
1126 outcome-based measurement shall be maintained and archived.
1127 a. Student Eye Screenings 1,448,230
1128 To provide eye screening for students in Grades K, 2 and 4. The method of
1129 screening shall be color photo refraction as developed by the National
1130 Aeronautics and Space Administration.
1131 b. Student Follow-Up Eye care 1,448,230
1132 To provide follow-up eye care for Grades K, 2 and 4 students. Follow-up eye
1133 care services shall include, but not be limited to, providing assistance in
1134 obtaining and coordinating local eye care services for those children
1135 identified as needing said follow-up eye care services whether insured,
1136 uninsured or underinsured.
1137 (10) Computer Science for Alabama 7,000,000
1138 (CS4AL) Program
1139 (11) Distance Learning 26,000,000
Page 47

(11) Distance Learning 26,000,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1140 Includes testing. Job descriptions shall be developed by the State
1141 Department of Education for positions funded by this appropriation. The
1142 hiring of personnel shall be monitored by the State Department of Education
1143 for compliance with these job descriptions. In addition, these funds shall
1144 be used exclusively for the distance learning initiative ACCESS (Alabama
1145 Connecting Classrooms, Educators, and Students Statewide). For the 2026-2027
1146 school year, the Department shall not charge any Alabama resident, whether
1147 home-schooled or enrolled in a non-public school, a fee to participate in
1148 the ACCESS Program.
1149 (12) English Language Learners 4,000,000
1150 Program
1151 a. Regional EL Specialists 2,000,000
1152 Regional EL Specialists under the State Department of Education and
1153 auxiliary support.
1154 (13) High Needs Special Education 14,000,000
1155 Grant Program
1156 To provide grants to school districts for services for students or groups of
1157 students for special education and related services that are unduly
1158 expensive, extraordinary and/or beyond routine.
1159 (14) Juvenile Probation Officers 750,000
1160 (15) Local School and School System 5,608,367
1161 Academic and Financial
1162 Improvement Program (At-Risk)
1163 a. Legislative School Performance 250,000
1164 Recognition Program
1165 For financial awards pursuant to the Legislative School Performance
1166 Recognition Program, as established by Section 16-6C-3, Code of Alabama
1167 1975.
Page 48

1975.
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1168 b. Feminine Hygiene Products 400,000
1169 Grant Program
1170 For Title I schools pursuant to Section 16-1-55, Code of Alabama 1975.
1171 c. Jones Valley Teaching Farm 700,000
1172 d. Retired Senior Volunteer 175,000
1173 Program
1174 To be used for student tutoring and mentoring. The funds allocated to the
1175 Retired Senior Volunteer Program shall not be used for salaries. The program
1176 shall file a report on October 1, 2026, with the Department of Education,
1177 the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, the
1178 House Ways and Means-Education Committee, the Finance Director, and the
1179 Legislative Fiscal Officer regarding the number of volunteer hours provided
1180 statewide and to each local school system for the prior year.
1181 e. Small Magic 350,000
1182 f. Youth Advocacy Program 300,000
1183 (16) Military Children Support Plan 800,000
1184 (17) Montgomery Pre-K Pilot Program 150,000
1185 (18) Online High-Speed Teacher 450,000
1186 Certification Portal
1187 To support improvements in teacher certification.
1188 (19) Operations and Maintenance of 38,999,215
1189 the Department
1190 a. Unmet Needs Grant Program 10,000,000
Page 49

a. Unmet Needs Grant Program 10,000,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1191 To be expended for a grant program to be administered by the State
1192 Superintendent of Education to address unmet capital, equipment, or other
1193 needs of K-12 schools. The Superintendent shall notify all members of the
1194 local legislative delegation five days prior to the announcement of any
1195 grant made to any K-12 school located in the legislative jurisdiction. The
1196 five days prior notice requirement shall be waived in the event of a
1197 declared emergency. The State Superintendent of Education shall report all
1198 grants awarded to the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and
1199 Taxation-Education, the House Ways and Means-Education Committee, the
1200 Finance Director, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer. Such report shall
1201 include amounts awarded and intended use of funds.
1202 (20) Pilot Programs 3,100,000
1203 a. Mental Health Telecounseling 2,500,000
1204 Pilot Project
1205 b. Montgomery Pilot Program: 200,000
1206 Career Direct Certification
1207 c. Montgomery Pilot Program: 200,000
1208 Conflict Resolution
1209 d. Montgomery Pilot Program: 164,000
1210 Bloom Bucks
1211 e. Montgomery Pilot Program: 36,000
1212 Mechatronics STEM Camp
1213 (21) School Safety Security and 17,800,000
1214 Climate Program
1215 a. Bullying Prevention Project 5,000,000
Page 50

a. Bullying Prevention Project 5,000,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1216 To be expended for the Bullying Prevention Project in accordance with Title
1217 16, Chapter 28B, Code of Alabama 1975. The State Superintendent of Education
1218 shall distribute the above appropriation as grants to local education
1219 agencies. These agencies may be awarded funds only after application to the
1220 State Department of Education. The grant application process may require the
1221 submission of plans by the applicant to meet the requirements set forth in
1222 Chapter 28B of Title 16. In the awarding of grants, preference will be given
1223 to applicants seeking to develop and implement evidence-based practices to
1224 promote a school environment that is free of harassment, intimidation,
1225 violence, and threats of violence. This program may also address tier one
1226 and tier two of the school-based mental health model of all students
1227 receiving prevention education and peers working to support and identify
1228 at-risk students. Additionally, the program may focus to increase school
1229 safety through early identification of at-risk students, minimizing
1230 disciplinary infractions including school suspensions and expulsions. The
1231 program may provide grade level prevention curriculum for all students and,
1232 in that case, the curriculum must be updated annually to remain current and
1233 relevant to current trends that youth face in their lives. Any applicable
1234 prevention curriculum must be comprehensive and satisfy the following state
1235 mandates: Erin's Law, Jamari Terrell Williams Student Bullying Prevention
1236 Act, Jason Flatt Act, Price Hornsby Act, and drugs and alcohol prevention
1237 programs. In addition, any program related to mental health should be
1238 flexible enough to focus on the greatest mental health needs for each
1239 individual school. For accountability purposes, reporting data must include
1240 the number of students engaged in the programs, the number of students
1241 supported, and the number of students referred to adults as at-risk.
1242 b. Mental Health Collaborative 250,000
1243 c. Regional Safety Training 800,000
1244 Specialists
Page 51

800,000
Specialists
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1245 d. School-Based Mental Health 9,250,000
1246 Service Coordinator
1247 The above appropriation shall be expended to provide grants to local
1248 education agencies and public independent schools to expand school-based
1249 mental health initiatives. The State Superintendent of Education shall
1250 notify, in writing, all school systems of the availability of the funding.
1251 The notification shall include the grant application and the amount
1252 available to each system. The grant application process must require the
1253 submission of plans by the applicant to provide for a mental health service
1254 coordinator to support coordination of mental health services throughout the
1255 system. In the awarding of grants, preference will be given to applicants
1256 willing to partner with the Alabama Department of Mental Health under the
1257 ADMH school-based Mental Health collaboration and traditionally high-poverty
1258 underserved districts throughout the state. After funding reaches $40,000
1259 for each system, additional funding for the program shall be allocated to
1260 school systems by the Alabama State Department of Education.
1261 (22) Special Education Licensed 8,500,000
1262 Interpreters Deaf/Hard of
1263 Hearing Teachers
1264 (23) Statewide Student Assessment 20,405,117
1265 To be expended for expenses directly related to student assessments. Funds
1266 from this appropriation shall be expended to administer all requirements of
1267 Section 16-46A-10, Code of Alabama, 1975.
1268 (24) STEM Education Consortium 1,500,000
1269 To be divided equally between the Cook Natural Science Museum, the McWane
1270 Center, and the Saban Center. Funds may be used to hire personnel with a
1271 course of study focused on STEM education, and for other necessary expenses.
1272 (25) Tenure Personnel Hearings 200,000
Page 52

(25) Tenure Personnel Hearings 200,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1273 To provide reimbursements for court reporters and hearing officers under the
1274 provisions of Title 16, Chapter 24C, Code of Alabama 1975.
1275 (26) Turnaround Schools 10,000,000
Page 53

(26) Turnaround Schools 10,000,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1276 This appropriation shall be used for the State Department of Education, in
1277 consultation with the Department of Early Childhood Education, to fund a
1278 program to be known as the Governor's Turnaround Schools. These grants are
1279 for the lowest performing public elementary schools which are identified as
1280 underperforming by the State Superintendent in consideration of the
1281 provisions of the Alabama Accountability Act, the State Report Card System,
1282 and other criteria as determined by the State Superintendent. The intent of
1283 these grants is to identify and target specific deficiencies of each
1284 individual underperforming elementary school and target said deficiencies
1285 with high quality and innovative educational supports. In consultation with
1286 these schools as well as the local education agencies that respectively
1287 oversee these schools, the State Department of Education will develop and
1288 oversee a comprehensive plan for school improvement. It is the intention of
1289 this provision that all areas of the State Department, including Alabama
1290 Reading Initiative, Alabama Math, Science, and Technology Initiative, Office
1291 of Mathematics Improvement, and Office of School Improvement, will work
1292 together to best serve these selected schools. Schools previously named to
1293 this list will be known as Cohort 1. Beginning with the fiscal year 2027
1294 Budget Request, the State Department will recommend a pathway for schools in
1295 Cohort 1 to exit this program, and the Department will recommend new schools
1296 to replace those exiting the program in subsequent years. These schools may
1297 be known as Cohort 2 and so forth. The State Superintendent may also request
1298 additional funds so that additional cohorts can be expanded as Cohort 1
1299 schools leave the program over the next few years. Any expansion of new
1300 Cohorts should be modest with respect to the purpose of this program which
1301 is expected to offer extraordinary supports to a relatively limited number
1302 of schools at a time. The State Department of Education should annually
1303 produce written progress reports on these schools to the Chair of the House
1304 Ways and Means - Education Committee, the Chair of the Senate Finance and
1305 Taxation - Education Committee, the Governor, and the Local School Board,
Page 54

Taxation - Education Committee, the Governor, and the Local School Board,
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1306 Superintendent, and Principal of each school.
1307 (27) Woolley Institute for Spoken 1,000,000
1308 Language Education
1309 (28) Office of School Improvement 2,200,560
1310 (29) Office of Specialized 27,800,000
1311 Treatment Centers
1312 Of the above appropriation, $27,000,000 shall be made available to the State
1313 Department of Education endorsed and approved Specialized Treatment Centers
1314 for the purpose of educational services and operational costs. The funds
1315 shall be allocated based on a formula using student counts and licensed
1316 capacity approved by the State Superintendent of Education.
1317 (30) Cameras in the Classroom Grant 600,000
1318 Program
1319 To be expended in accordance with Section 16-39-13, Code of Alabama 1975 to
1320 promote classroom and student safety in self-contained classrooms providing
1321 special education services. The above appropriation shall be expended to
1322 provide grants to public K-12 schools to use toward the purchase,
1323 installation, maintenance, and monitoring of video cameras in the
1324 classrooms. Priority shall be given first to schools with financial
1325 challenges and/or with high percentages of nonverbal children. The State
1326 Department of Education shall notify in writing all local boards of
1327 education, by July 1, 2026, of the availability of funds. The notification
1328 shall include the grant application process and the criterion used to
1329 determine the grant amounts awarded. No funding will be available until
1330 October 1, 2026.
1331 (31) Principal Leadership and 33,205,115
1332 Mentoring Act
Page 55

33,205,115
Mentoring Act
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1333 To be expended in accordance with Title 16, Chapter 6I, Code of Alabama
1334 1975. Eligible personel at the the Department of Youth Services and Career
1335 Tech shall be allowed to participate in the program.
1336 (32) Speech Pathologist Stipend 775,000
1337 Program
1338 The above appropriation includes funds to pay salary supplements and related
1339 benefit costs for Speech Pathologists and other costs of the program.
1340 Supplement amounts will be $1,000 for each Speech Pathologist, including the
1341 Alabama Institute for the Deaf and Blind and Department of Youth Services
1342 School District.
1343 (33) Alabama Teacher Observation 1,000,000
1344 Tool
1345 To offer training and support for impactful classroom observations,
1346 providing prescriptive professional learning, guidance for elevating
1347 accomplished teaching, and improving student outcomes; and to maintain an
1348 electronic reporting system for all LEAs to utilize in this work.
1349 (34) CPR Kits 250,000
1350 $250,000 to assist LEAs with the purchase of hands-on CPR kits to be
1351 utilized in the classroom to support the hands-on practicing requirement and
1352 cognitive learning pursuant to Section 16-40-8, Code of Alabama 1975.
1353 (b) American Village 2,520,000 2,520,000
1354 (1) U.S. History Commission 200,000
1355 (2) Civics Partnership 750,000
1356 In collaboration with Troy University.
1357 (3) Debate programs for high needs 250,000
1358 schools
1359 (4) U.S. Constitution Program 200,000
Page 56

(4) U.S. Constitution Program 200,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1360 To develop and implement a new high school-level program or curriculum
1361 focused on the United States Constitution, aligned to the Alabama Course of
1362 Study: Social Studies, 2024.
1363 (c) Alabama Science in Motion Program 2,583,796 2,583,796
1364 All funds appropriated to this program shall be expended in accordance with
1365 Title 16, Chapters 61B and 61C, Code of Alabama 1975. Additionally, any funds
1366 unexpended and carried over from prior fiscal years are hereby reappropriated.
1367 Of the above appropriation, the State Superintendent of Education shall direct
1368 ASIMS funding to each site within the In-service Center regions based on the
1369 most recent year's contractual agreements. This appropriation shall not be
1370 transferred and must be expended in accordance with the intent of the
1371 appropriation of each of the ASIMS sites. The State Superintendent of
1372 Education shall report semi-annually to the Chairs of the Senate Committee on
1373 Finance and Taxation-Education, the House Ways and Means-Education Committee,
1374 the Permanent Joint Legislative Committee on Finance and Budgets, the Finance
1375 Director, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer the expenditures for the Alabama
1376 Science in Motion Program. Such report shall include, but not be limited to,
1377 the amounts expended for the equipment, materials, and supplies needed to
1378 teach Biology, Chemistry and Physics, as well as the amounts expended for
1379 professional development and for on-site support. The existing Alabama Science
1380 in Motion Advisory Committee shall advise the State Superintendent of
1381 Education on the operational activities of the ASIMS Program. The ASIMS
1382 Advisory Committee shall remain comprised of six project directors, three
1383 ASIMS Specialists and three classroom teachers; provided, however, that each
1384 of the sites shall be represented by at least one member of the ASIMS Advisory
1385 Committee. No funds appropriated for the Alabama Science in Motion Program may
1386 be repurposed by the State Superintendent of Education for any other purpose
1387 other than those already established herein.
1388 (d) Disability Determination for 107,902,162 107,902,162
1389 Social Security Program
1390 (e) Financial Assistance Program 169,515,627 2,185,993,612 2,355,509,239
Page 57

(e) Financial Assistance Program 169,515,627 2,185,993,612 2,355,509,239
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1391 (1) Alabama Baseball Coaches 125,000
1392 Association
1393 No scholarship awarded by the association shall be awarded to a recipient
1394 that is an immediate family member of a current baseball coach.
1395 (2) Alabama Sports Officials 75,000
1396 Foundation
1397 (3) Alabama Football Coaches 150,000
1398 Association
1399 No scholarship awarded by the association shall be awarded to a recipient
1400 that is an immediate family member of a current football coach.
1401 (4) Alabama Multi-Tier System of 2,000,000
1402 Supports
1403 To support the Alabama-developed, state-level Multi-tiered System of Support
1404 (AL-MTSS) Framework, as required by the Alabama Literacy Act and the Alabama
1405 Numeracy Act. This comprehensive support addresses both academic and
1406 non-academic student indicators, including those reported on the State
1407 Report Card (A-F Grading System), to drive meaningful, lasting improvement.
1408 (5) Advanced Innovation Grant 8,000,000
1409 Program
1410 a. AI-Ready Classrooms 2,000,000
1411 b. Alabama Digital Literacy 1,500,000
1412 Program
1413 c. ALET Learning Platform 1,000,000
1414 d. Plasma Games 2,000,000
1415 e. Prisms STEM Virtual Reality 1,500,000
1416 Program
1417 (6) Alabama Scholars Bowl TV Show 100,000
1418 (7) Alabama Teacher Mentor Program 5,000,000
Page 58

(7) Alabama Teacher Mentor Program 5,000,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1419 In each school where there is at least one or more first-year teachers, a
1420 mentor teacher shall be identified and recommended by the school principal
1421 to the Department of Education based on (1) his or her commitment to
1422 collaborative work and (2) he or she having at least five years of teaching
1423 experience. The mentor teacher shall be compensated in an amount of no less
1424 than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the academic year for his or her
1425 services as a mentor. The Department shall clearly define roles and
1426 responsibilities for the mentor teacher to, at a minimum, include (1)
1427 requiring at least two meetings per month of the mentor teacher and the
1428 first-year teacher during the school year, and (2) requiring mid-year and
1429 year-end reporting by the mentor teacher to his or her principal relating to
1430 the progress of each first-year teacher he or she is mentoring.
1431 (8) Career Tech Initiative 38,682,239
1432 The above appropriation shall be spent on expanding career tech learning
1433 opportunities for students and to extend leadership and student organized
1434 activities throughout the state as defined by the State Superintendent of
1435 Education.
1436 a. Agribusiness Education Program 726,900
1437 $275,000 of the amount above shall be expended for student membership dues
1438 for Future Farmers of America.
1439 b. Alabama Cattleman's Youth 80,000
1440 Program
1441 For an educational event where youth from all across Alabama can learn about
1442 beef nutrition and sustainable livestock production and can compete in
1443 educational contests and exhibit cattle.
1444 c. Agriscience Teachers 1,000,000
Page 59

c. Agriscience Teachers 1,000,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1445 Not more than $1,000,000 of the appropriation for Career Tech Initiatives
1446 shall be first used for agriscience purposes if an adequate number of RFP's
1447 are received. Such funds shall be made available through a competitive grant
1448 process to pay stipends, salaries, benefits and travel of agriscience
1449 teachers who work on a 220 day or less contract provided their duties and
1450 activities exceed existing contract length. In the event all the agriscience
1451 funds are not applied for, the balance of the $1,000,000 shall revert to the
1452 balance of the appropriation and shall be distributed at the discretion of
1453 the State Superintendent of Education for additional career tech initiatives
1454 not limited to but including travel and student leadership development
1455 activities in other career tech program disciplines.
1456 d. Career Coaches Program 15,723,370
1457 To expand the Career Coaches Program. Career coaches who are certified as
1458 teachers may be compensated on the state minimum salary schedule for
1459 teachers based upon years of experience, highest degree earned, and the
1460 length of contract in the same manner as classroom teachers.
1461 e. Imagine Academy 794,372
1462 f. ProStart Career and Technical 300,000
1463 Education Program
1464 (9) Children's Hospital 1,540,000
1465 a. Poison Control 800,000
1466 b. Sunshine School 400,000
1467 (10) Coach Safely Initiative 850,000
1468 (11) Grow Your Own 569,750
Page 60

(11) Grow Your Own 569,750
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1469 To provide matching funds for scholarships to students from rural high
1470 schools, designated as either Rural-Distant or Rural-Remote by the NCES, who
1471 qualify for full Pell Grant eligibility plus the TEACH Grant to attend and
1472 graduate from a 4-year in-state college or university Teacher Education
1473 Preparation Program who will then return to their home community to teach
1474 for a minimum of 5 years.
1475 (12) Helping Families Initiative 3,500,000
1476 Not more than 15% of the appropriation shall be used for indirect, overhead,
1477 administration, training, or support expenses. The Helping Families
1478 Initiative shall file a report no later than September 30, 2027 with the
1479 Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, the House
1480 Ways and Means-Education Committee, the Legislative Fiscal Officer, and the
1481 Finance Director regarding the number of students served by each LEA. The
1482 report shall include measures and be in a format as prescribed by the
1483 Legislative Services Agency.
1484 (13) Healthy Eating, Active Living 1,080,000
1485 (HEAL, Inc.)
1486 (14) High Hopes for Alabama 11,980,287
1487 Students
1488 (15) Hudson Alpha Institute - 2,000,000
1489 Science Teacher Training
1490 (16) Jobs for Alabama's Graduates 7,050,742
1491 (JAG)
1492 (17) Liberty Learning Foundation 1,175,000
1493 (18) National Board Certification 2,050,000
1494 of Teachers
Page 61

2,050,000
of Teachers
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1495 The amounts below are minimum amounts. The balance of funds shall be
1496 expended to provide fee support to candidates seeking certification. Any
1497 unused portion of the funds shall be expended for aforementioned candidate
1498 support and professional development. Priority shall be given to candidates
1499 in certificate areas of need as determined by the State Superintendent of
1500 Education (e.g. Mathematics, Literacy, Science, English Language Arts,
1501 Career and Technical Education, etc.); candidates who agree to teach at a
1502 school with five or fewer National Board Certified Teachers for a period of
1503 three years; and additional need criteria determined by the State
1504 Superintendent of Education.
1505 a. Accomplished Teaching, 50,000
1506 Learning and Schools (ATLAS)
1507 b. Candidate Support and 50,000
1508 Professional Development
1509 During the certification process.
1510 c. Mentors and mentoring 550,000
1511 coordination for NBCT
1512 candidates and educators
1513 To assist Regional Inservice Centers in providing mentors and mentoring
1514 coordination for National Board Certified candidates and educators under the
1515 direction of and in collaboration with the State Department of Education.
1516 (19) National Board for 13,712,908
1517 Professional Teaching Standards
Page 62

13,712,908
Professional Teaching Standards
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1518 The above appropriation includes funds to pay salary supplements and related
1519 benefit costs for Nationally Board-Certified Teachers (NBCT) and other costs
1520 of the program. Supplement amounts will be determined by the availability of
1521 funds based on the number of National Board Certified Teachers. (1) The
1522 state of Alabama will provide an annual supplement of $5,000 to any NBCT
1523 that is employed full-time in a public K-12 school and is properly certified
1524 by the state of Alabama. The existing eligibility criteria will apply: (a)
1525 NBCTs employed on a less than full-time contract on October 1 will receive a
1526 pro-rata share of the salary supplement. (b) NBCTs employed full-time after
1527 October 1 will receive a pro-rata share of the salary supplement. (c) NBCTs
1528 who earn National Board Certification in another state and are teaching
1529 full-time in Alabama on October 1 and are properly certified by the state of
1530 Alabama will receive the annual salary stipend. (d) NBCTs employed as a
1531 substitute are not eligible for the salary supplement. (e) NBCTs who are on
1532 leave of absence for more than half a school year will receive a prorated
1533 amount based on the number of months worked during the school year. (f)
1534 NBCTs will receive the salary supplement each year of the valid period of
1535 the certificate unless the Alabama Legislature declines to make the annual
1536 appropriation. (g) NBCTs must renew their certificate by the year of the
1537 certificate's expiration in order to continue receiving the salary
1538 supplement. (h) NBCTs employed in the final year of the certificate valid
1539 period will receive a prorated amount based on the number of months worked
1540 covered in that valid period. (i) NBCTs who leave after October 1 will be
1541 eligible for a prorated amount based on the months served. (j) NBCTs must
1542 remain employed with a public K-12 local Board of Education in order to
1543 continue receiving the salary supplement. (2) In addition to the supplement
1544 provided by subsection (1) of this section, classroom teachers shall be
1545 eligible for an additional supplement of $5,000 if in an instructional
1546 assignment in challenging, high poverty schools, subject to the following
1547 conditions and limitations: (a) Teacher holds a valid NBPTS certificate in
Page 63

conditions and limitations: (a) Teacher holds a valid NBPTS certificate in
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1548 Literacy, English Language Arts, English as a New Language, Math, Science,
1549 Exceptional Needs, or Career and Technical Education; and (b) School has
1550 been on the "Priority School" list 3 of the last 5 years; and/or (c) School
1551 has a graduation rate more than 10% less than the state average for 2 of the
1552 3 most recently posted years; and/or (d) School has a free and reduced
1553 federal lunch student percentage of 75% or greater as determined by the most
1554 recent data posted or provides meals to all students through the Community
1555 Eligibility Provision. The State Department of Education shall file a report
1556 on or before September 30, 2027 with the Chairs of the Senate Committee on
1557 Finance and Taxation-Education, House Ways and Means-Education Committee,
1558 the Finance Director, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer regarding the
1559 number of classroom teachers becoming eligible and receiving the additional
1560 supplement provided in (2) above during fiscal year 2027.
1561 (20) Reach and Teach 350,000
1562 (21) Robotics Grant Program 1,400,000
1563 The above appropriation shall be expended to provide grants of not more than
1564 $3,500 per school to support robotics programs. The State Department of
1565 Education shall notify in writing all school systems, by July 1, 2026, of
1566 the availability of funding for elementary, middle and high school robotics
1567 programs. The notification shall include the grant application process and
1568 the amount of funding available to each school. No funding will be available
1569 until October 1, 2026.
1570 a. Elementary Robotics Grant 250,000
1571 Program
1572 (22) Educational Delivery Options 5,000,000
1573 for Public Schools Grant
1574 Program
1575 To be allocated to at least two school systems and funds divided equally
1576 between the two systems.
1577 (23) Southern Research Institute 750,000
Page 64

(23) Southern Research Institute 750,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1578 The above appropriation shall be used to expand the Science, Technology,
1579 Engineering, and Mathematics (STEM) Educational Outreach Program statewide.
1580 (24) Southwest School of Deaf and 198,865
1581 Blind
1582 (25) Special Education Behavior 13,500,000
1583 Analysts (Autism)
1584 (26) Special Education Pre-School 30,000,000
1585 Program
1586 (27) Student and Teacher Plant 500,000
1587 Science Consortium (formerly
1588 Student Botanical Pilot
1589 Project)
1590 (28) Symphony in Education Program 325,000
1591 (29) Teach for America 822,000
1592 It is the intent of the Legislature that funds appropriated for Teach for
1593 America be used to employ veterans of the United States Armed Forces where
1594 possible. Any teachers employed with these funds shall only teach in the
1595 subject area for which they have demonstrated competency as determined and
1596 approved by the State Department of Education.
1597 (30) Teacher In-Service Centers 3,509,080
Page 65

(30) Teacher In-Service Centers 3,509,080
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1598 The State Superintendent of Education shall administer the In-Service
1599 Centers by confirming the areas of focus for professional development
1600 activities, monitoring and approving the professional development plan of
1601 the centers, approving the budget, and evaluating the centers on an annual
1602 basis to determine performance outcomes and identify any deficiencies and
1603 require any necessary corrective measures. Nothing herein shall require the
1604 existing in-service regions be redrawn or require the State Superintendent
1605 to distribute AMSTI, ASIMS, technology in motion, or other funds to more
1606 than the existing in-service regions. The above appropriation to the
1607 In-Service Centers shall be distributed to the In-Service Centers as
1608 provided below.
1609 a. Alabama A and M University 320,086
1610 b. Alabama at Birmingham, 346,848
1611 University of
1612 c. Alabama State University 282,287
1613 d. Alabama, University of 263,249
1614 e. Athens State University 274,838
1615 f. Auburn University 284,217
1616 g. Jacksonville State University 279,528
1617 h. Montevallo, University of 291,391
1618 i. North Alabama, University of 258,283
1619 j. South Alabama, University of 368,644
1620 k. Troy University 293,875
1621 l. West Alabama, University of 245,834
1622 (31) Teacher Professional 3,697,293
1623 Development Training
Page 66

3,697,293
Development Training
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1624 The Department shall file a report with the Chairs of the House Ways and
1625 Means-Education Committee, the Senate Committee on Finance and
1626 Taxation-Education, the Finance Director, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer
1627 on the first day of the 2027 Regular Session regarding the expenditures and
1628 usage of the funds appropriated to these programs in fiscal year 2027.
1629 a. Computer Science Educator 300,000
1630 Training
1631 The ALSDE shall coordinate and, as needed, allocate funds through a
1632 competitive grant process for state entities (e.g., non-profits, higher ed)
1633 to offer professional development on curricula that has been approved by the
1634 ALSDE for a computer science pathway; curricula should be open and available
1635 across multiple computing platforms (e.g., available within a web browser).
1636 Funding shall be used for professional development and teacher support. The
1637 ALSDE shall provide a report of the initiative to the Chair of the House
1638 Ways and Means-Education Committee and the Chair of the Senate Committee on
1639 Finance and Taxation-Education no later than June 15, 2027.
1640 b. Middle School Computer 613,907
1641 Programming Initiative
1642 The Department shall allocate funds through a competitive grant process for
1643 local education agencies. Each grant may be used for professional
1644 development, training, and curriculum, and shall not exceed $25,000. The
1645 Department shall provide a report of the initiative to the Chair of the
1646 House Ways and Means-Education Committee and the Chair of the Senate
1647 Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education no later than June 1, 2027.
1648 c. Special Education Professional 188,907
1649 Development Program
1650 For educators and school board members.
1651 d. Technology in Motion Program 2,594,479
Page 67

d. Technology in Motion Program 2,594,479
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1652 To train teachers (K-12) on authentic computer science and other technology
1653 program training as directed by the State Superintendent. High school and
1654 middle school teachers from math, science, and career tech will be trained
1655 to offer stand-alone Computer Science courses, and elementary teachers will
1656 be trained to integrate computer science into weekly activities, following
1657 nationally developed curricula that address the Alabama Course of Study:
1658 Digital Literacy and Computer Science.
1659 (32) Teacher Recruitment Programs 6,200,000
1660 a. AKEEP Education and Teacher 200,000
1661 Recruitment Partnership
1662 In collaboration with the Alabama Commission on Higher Education and
1663 operated in the same manner as in fiscal year 2026.
1664 b. Alabama Recruit and Retain 700,000
1665 Urban/Rural Teachers
1666 In collaboration with the Alabama Commission on Higher Education and
1667 operated in the same manner as in fiscal year 2026.
1668 c. STEM major teacher recruitment 4,500,000
1669 program
1670 In collaboration with the Alabama Commission on Higher Education and
1671 operated in the same manner as in fiscal year 2026.
1672 d. Teacher Recruitment and 800,000
1673 Placement
1674 (33) Vaping Education Program 150,000
1675 The above appropriation shall be used by the Drug Education Council in
1676 coordination with the Department of Education to conduct vaping prevention
1677 education programs for elementary, middle, and high school students.
1678 (34) Youth Leadership and 525,000
1679 Development Program
Page 68

525,000
Development Program
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1680 For the expansion of a leadership development program for high school
1681 juniors and seniors based on the three pillars of faith, character, and
1682 patriotism.
1683 (35) Athletic Trainers Secondary 300,000
1684 School Incentive Program
1685 To be expended in accordance with Sections 34-40-31 through 34-40-35, Code
1686 of Alabama 1975.
1687 (36) Big Brothers/Big Sisters 200,000
1688 (37) B.A.S.S. 347,463
1689 For the high school combine at Ingalls Harbor in collaboration with the
1690 Department of Conservation and Natural Resources.
1691 a. Boating Safety Training 147,463
1692 (38) Alabama Shakespeare Festival 2,000,000
1693 (39) Youth Sports Initiative for 100,000
1694 Physical Wellness
1695 (f) Future Teachers of Alabama 250,000 250,000
1696 The above appropriation shall be expended to provide grants of not more than
1697 $1,500 to each senior high school to establish and support Future Teachers of
1698 Alabama programs by funding stipends of $1,000 for teachers to serve as
1699 program directors at each school and the remaining $500 being used for program
1700 activities and expenses. The State Department of Education shall notify in
1701 writing all school systems, by July 1, 2026, of the availability of funding
1702 for senior high school Future Teachers of Alabama programs. The notification
1703 shall include the grant application process and clearly defined program
1704 expectations. The Department of Education shall allocate funds to schools no
1705 later than November 1.
1706 (g) Gifted Students Program 2,454,687 2,454,687
1707 (1) Gifted Student Grant Program 2,454,687
1708 Pursuant to Section 16-1-51, Code of Alabama 1975.
Page 69

Pursuant to Section 16-1-51, Code of Alabama 1975.
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1709 (h) Kindervision 250,000 250,000
1710 (i) Liability Insurance Program 17,500,000 17,500,000
1711 (j) Reading is Fundamental Program 30,000 30,000
1712 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1713 (1) ETF 769,174,466
1714 (2) ETF-Transfer 2,583,796
1715 (3) Driver Education and Training 5,145,634
1716 Fund
1717 (4) Federal and Local Funds 2,349,300,323
1718 (5) Special Education Catastrophic 5,000,000
1719 Fund
1720 Total Education, State Department of 771,758,262 2,359,445,957 3,131,204,219
1721 The funds appropriated above shall not be used to implement standards, programs or
1722 student assessments created by the Common Core State Standards Initiative after
1723 April 1, 2013.
1724 16. Educational Television Commission:
1725 (a) Educational Television Program 10,854,510 1,275,403 12,129,913
1726 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1727 (1) ETF 10,854,510
1728 (2) Federal and Local Funds 1,275,403
1729 Total Educational Television Commission 10,854,510 1,275,403 12,129,913
1730 The above appropriation is made with encouragement that it only be used for
1731 programming that is unbiased, appropriate for the audiences to which it is targeted,
1732 and fails to promote specific political or social ideology.
1733
1734
1735
1736
1737 17. Evaluation of Services, Alabama
1738 Commission on the:
Page 70

Commission on the:
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1739 (a) Special Services Program 944,100 944,100
1740 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1741 (1) ETF 944,100
1742 Total Evaluation of Services, Alabama 944,100 944,100
1743 Commission on the
1744 18. Executive Commission on Community
1745 Services Grants, State:
1746 (a) Community Services Grants Program 12,604,798 12,604,798
1747 Distributed pursuant to Section 29-2-123, Code of Alabama 1975.
1748 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1749 (1) ETF 12,604,798
1750 Total Executive Commission on Community 12,604,798 12,604,798
1751 Services Grants, State
1752 The above appropriation shall be used for grants that promote public education
1753 purposes.
1754 19. Family Practice Rural Health Board:
1755 (a) Family Practice Rural Health 3,994,823 3,994,823
1756 Program
1757 (1) Auburn Rural Health Program 500,000
1758 (2) Rural Medical Scholars Program 962,500
1759 - University of Alabama at
1760 Tuscaloosa
1761 (3) Tuskegee Area Health Education 89,815
1762 Center (TAHEC)
1763 Minimum amount.
1764 (4) UAH Rural Health Program 823,400
1765 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1766 (1) ETF 3,994,823
Page 71

(1) ETF 3,994,823
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1767 Total Family Practice Rural Health 3,994,823 3,994,823
1768 Board
1769 20. Finance, Department of:
1770 (a) Fiscal Management Program 969,603 969,603
1771 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1772 (1) ETF 969,603
1773 Total Finance, Department of 969,603 969,603
1774 21. Finance-Teacher Unused Sick Leave:
1775 (a) Employee Benefits Program 2,500,000 2,500,000
1776 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1777 (1) ETF 2,500,000
1778 Total Finance-Teacher Unused Sick Leave 2,500,000 2,500,000
1779 To be distributed by the State Comptroller to the designated beneficiaries or
1780 estates for unused sick leave pursuant to Section 16-1-18.2, Code of Alabama 1975.
1781 22. Fine Arts, Alabama School of:
1782 (a) Financial Assistance Program 14,637,952 1,139,500 15,777,452
1783 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1784 (1) ETF 14,637,952
1785 (2) Federal and Local Funds 1,139,500
1786 Total Fine Arts, Alabama School of 14,637,952 1,139,500 15,777,452
1787 23. Fire Fighters Personnel Standards
1788 and Education Commission,
1789 Alabama/Fire College:
1790 (a) Operations and Maintenance 7,185,588 5,133,118 12,318,706
1791 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1792 (1) ETF 7,185,588
1793 (2) Federal and Local Funds 5,133,118
Page 72

(2) Federal and Local Funds 5,133,118
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1794 Total Fire Fighters Personnel Standards 7,185,588 5,133,118 12,318,706
1795 and Education Commission, Alabama/Fire
1796 College
1797 24. Geological Survey:
1798 (a) Discovery and Development of 618,754 618,754
1799 Mineral, Energy and Water
1800 Resources, Geologic Research and
1801 Topographic Mapping Program
1802 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1803 (1) ETF 618,754
1804 Total Geological Survey 618,754 618,754
1805 25. Governor's Office of Volunteer
1806 Services:
1807 (a) Executive Direction Program 414,140 414,140
1808 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1809 (1) ETF 414,140
1810 Total Governor's Office of Volunteer 414,140 414,140
1811 Services
1812 26. Health, Department of Public:
1813 (a) Administrative Services Program 1,180,079 1,180,079
1814 (b) Children's Health Insurance 9,250,000 9,250,000
1815 Program (CHIP)
1816 (c) Continuing Education for EMT 1,635,782 1,635,782
1817 Personnel
1818 With the above appropriation, the Department shall offer performance-based
1819 awards to regional EMS agencies for the purpose of providing continuing
1820 education to EMTs and strengthening the EMS infrastructure.
1821 (d) Office of Emergency Medical 1,000,000 1,000,000
1822 Services
Page 73

1,000,000 1,000,000
Services
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1823 (1) Alabama Trauma Communications 1,000,000
1824 Center
1825 To be expended by the State Health Officer to improve and support the
1826 Alabama Trauma Communications Center located at the University of Alabama at
1827 Birmingham. The office shall report by March 1, 2027, how the money was
1828 spent or was planned to be spent, and what measurable improvements were
1829 expected from the spending, and report by January 1, 2028, on the extent to
1830 which goals for improvement were met or are on track to be met. The reports
1831 shall be delivered to the Governor and to the Chairs of the House Ways and
1832 Means-Education Committee and the Senate Committee on Finance and
1833 Taxation-Education.
1834 (e) Public Health Services Program 19,584,866 19,584,866
1835 (1) AIDS Alabama 625,000
1836 (2) Alabama Health Education 690,000
1837 Centers
1838 (3) Alabama Kidney Foundation 550,000
1839 (4) Impact Alabama 1,195,000
1840 a. Home First Program 200,000
1841 (5) Lions Sight eye screening 500,000
1842 (6) Medical Education and 4,254,000
1843 Residency Programs
1844 a. Primary Care Physician 800,000
1845 residency program - through
1846 Cahaba Clinic
1847 b. North Alabama Rural Dental 1,450,000
1848 Clinic Residency Program
1849 c. Rural Psychiatry Residency 200,000
1850 Program
Page 74

200,000
Program
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1851 d. Alabama Medical Education 725,000
1852 Consortium
1853 e. Franklin Rural Residency 694,000
1854 Program
1855 f. Rural Alabama Teaching Health 385,000
1856 Center
1857 (7) Partnering in Training in 500,000
1858 Healthcare (PATH)
1859 (8) Partnering in Training in 250,000
1860 Healthcare (PATH) - School
1861 health providers
1862 (9) Statewide Trauma System 250,000
1863 (10) Statewide Stroke System 200,000
1864 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1865 (1) ETF 23,400,727
1866 (2) ETF-Transfer 9,250,000
1867 Total Health, Department of Public 32,650,727 32,650,727
1868 27. School of Healthcare Sciences,
1869 Alabama:
1870 (a) Financial Assistance Program 6,265,990 6,265,990
1871 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1872 (1) ETF 6,265,990
1873 Total School of Healthcare Sciences, 6,265,990 6,265,990
1874 Alabama
1875 28. Higher Education, Alabama
1876 Commission on:
1877 (a) Deferred Maintenance Program 5,000,000 5,000,000
Page 75

(a) Deferred Maintenance Program 5,000,000 5,000,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1878 The above appropriation is to be deposited into a separate fund to be
1879 allocated for a grant program for the Historically Black Colleges and
1880 Universities in the state. The grants are to be allocated for deferred
1881 maintenance on existing structures and cannot be utilized for new
1882 construction. The grant program shall be administered by ACHE, and ACHE shall
1883 establish rules for the implementation of the grant program, the application
1884 process for the grants, and the awarding of the grants. Grants shall be
1885 awarded based on demonstrated needs, and ACHE shall develop and implement a
1886 scoring process to evaluate each grant application, which may include the
1887 availability of matching funds from the college or university, and certify
1888 compliance with grant award following project completion. ACHE shall submit an
1889 annual report to the Governor, the Chairs of the Senate Finance and
1890 Taxation-Education Committee, House Ways and Means-Education Committee, the
1891 Finance Director and the Legislative Fiscal Officer within 30 days after
1892 September 30, 2027. The report shall include the recipient, amount, and
1893 approved use of each grant issued. Notwithstanding any other provision of law
1894 to the contrary, any of the above funds which remain unexpended on September
1895 30, 2027, shall not revert, but shall be reappropriated in the fiscal year
1896 beginning October 1, 2027, to be expended for the grant program.
1897 (b) Planning and Coordination 11,533,866 486,239 12,020,105
1898 Services Program
1899 (1) FAFSA Completion Assistance 580,000
1900 (2) Industry Credential Directory 100,000
1901 Of the above appropriation, $100,000 shall be allocated for a non-public
1902 facing credential registry for college and university credentials. The
1903 credential registry shall include all degree and non-degree credentials
1904 offered at public colleges and universities. Data from the college and
1905 university credential registry shall be shared via a data sharing agreement
1906 to the public facing Alabama Credential Registry managed by the Alabama
1907 Department of Workforce.
1908 (3) Move on When Ready 3,000,000
Page 76

(3) Move on When Ready 3,000,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1909 Pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 46D, Title 16, Code of Alabama 1975.
1910 (4) Operations and Maintenance 4,618,866
1911 (5) Pathways to Progress 600,000
1912 (6) ReEngage Program 1,935,000
1913 The above appropriation and any prior appropriations from the Education
1914 Trust Fund for the ReEngage Program are to be deposited into a separate fund
1915 to be allocated under the provisions of Sections 16-33D-3 through 16-33D-7,
1916 Code of Alabama 1975.
1917
1918
1919 (7) Retain Alabama 650,000
1920 The Retain Alabama project will provide digital marketing strategies
1921 targeting soon-to-be college graduates, promotional materials about Alabama
1922 and career opportunities, and other strategies to retain Alabama College
1923 graduates initiated by the Executive Director in collaboration and
1924 coordination with Innovate Alabama. The Retention Initiative would help
1925 retain Alabama College graduates by: (1) Identifying internships, co-op
1926 opportunities, and entry-level jobs at emerging companies and established
1927 companies in Alabama; (2) Partnering with Alabama colleges and universities
1928 to promote these career opportunities to Alabama college students throughout
1929 the State; and (3) Creating opportunities for Alabama college students to
1930 learn more about communities throughout Alabama, while also engaging with
1931 other students to create a cohort environment.
1932 a. Alabama Higher Education 250,000
1933 Partnership Student Retention
1934 Council Program
1935 b. Retain Alabama Project 400,000
1936 Administered by ACHE
1937 (8) Study Alabama 50,000
Page 77

(8) Study Alabama 50,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1938 (c) Student Financial Aid Program 33,790,549 1,000,000 34,790,549
1939 (1) Alabama National Guard 9,831,114
1940 Educational Assistance
1941 Scholarships
1942 To be expended in accordance with Sections 31-10-1 through 31-10-5 and
1943 Sections 31-10-20 through 31-10-24, Code of Alabama 1975.
1944 (2) Alabama Student Assistance 10,000,000
1945 Program
1946 (3) Birmingham Promise Scholarship 892,500
1947 Program
1948 (4) Educational Grants Program 10,500,000
1949 (Alabama Student Grant Program)
1950 To be expended in accordance with Sections 16-33A-1 through 16-33A-11, Code
1951 of Alabama 1975. Private institutions receiving state grant funds under this
1952 provision shall make their best effort to use the equivalent of 10% of
1953 Federal Work Study allocations for the purpose of tutoring and mentoring
1954 students in grades K-12 to better prepare them for graduation, college entry
1955 and retention. Institutions shall work with their respective governing
1956 boards to develop and implement this effort.
1957 (5) Math and Science Teacher 1,000,000
1958 Education Program
1959 To be expended pursuant to Sections 16-5-50, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
1960 ACHE shall submit an annual report to the Governor and to the Chairs of the
1961 Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, House Ways and
1962 Means-Education Committee and the Legislative Fiscal Officer within 30 days
1963 after September 30, 2027, including updates on all aspects of the program.
1964 (6) Policeman's Survivor Tuition, 466,935
1965 Estimated
Page 78

466,935
Estimated
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1966 To be expended under the provisions of Section 36-21-105, Code of Alabama
1967 1975.
1968 (7) Indian Affairs Scholarship 100,000
1969 Program
1970 (8) Alabama Law Enforcement 2,000,000
1971 Officers' Family Scholarship
1972 Program
1973 (d) Support of Other Educational 3,925,063 7,144,819 11,069,882
1974 Activities Program
1975 (1) Articulation and General 999,589
1976 Studies Committee (AGSC)/
1977 Statewide Transfer and
1978 Articulation Reporting System
1979 (STARS)
1980 To be expended in accordance with Section 16-5-8(e), Code of Alabama 1975.
1981 The purpose of AGSC/STARS is to provide Alabama college students with a
1982 simplified, seamless, and streamlined transfer process by providing them
1983 with accurate transfer information through state-approved transfer guides.
1984 STARS is housed at Troy University. The Commission shall work to ensure that
1985 dual enrollment courses apply towards a degree where applicable.
1986 (2) Best and Brightest STEM Pilot 250,000
1987 Program
1988 Pursuant to the provisions of Act 2020-204.
1989 (3) EPSCoR (Research) Program 1,460,184
1990 Of the above appropriation, at least thirty percent (30%) may be expended
1991 for the operations and maintenance of the Alabama Experimental Program to
1992 Stimulate Competitive Research (Alabama EPSCoR) administrative offices
1993 located at the University of Alabama at Birmingham.
Page 79

located at the University of Alabama at Birmingham.
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1994 (4) Network of Alabama Academic 384,076
1995 Libraries
1996 ACHE shall provide for the participation of Athens State University in the
1997 Network of Alabama Academic Libraries.
1998 (5) Southern Regional Education 831,214
1999 Board (SREB)
2000 (e) Support of State Universities 6,491,283 6,491,283
2001 Program
2002 (1) Alabama Agricultural Land 6,491,283
2003 Grant Alliance
2004 a. McIntire-Stennis Forestry 539,524
2005 Research Initiative Matching
2006 Program
2007 b. State Matching Funds 5,006,831
2008 To be distributed as a state match for federal funds for those institutions
2009 in the Alliance required to provide matching state funds for the first time
2010 in the fiscal year 2000.
2011 c. Tuskegee University - USDA 944,928
2012 Matching Funds
2013 (f) Support of Other State Programs 19,410,376 19,410,376
2014 (1) Adaptive and Disability Sports 60,000
2015 Education
2016 (2) Alabama Civil Air Patrol 155,000
2017 (3) Alabama Forestry Commission 200,000
2018 Education Program
2019 (4) Alabama Forestry Foundation 532,000
2020 Black Belt Initiative
2021 (5) Alabama Trails Foundation 340,000
2022 (6) Black Belt Adventures 500,000
Page 80

(6) Black Belt Adventures 500,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2023 (7) Black Belt Treasures 350,000
2024 (8) National Computer Forensics 650,000
2025 Institute
2026 (9) Resource Conservation and 10,500,000
2027 Development Programs (RC and D)
2028 (10) Soil and Water Conservation 3,023,376
2029 Committee Program
2030 (11) State of Alabama Humanities 300,000
2031 Foundation
2032 (12) USS Alabama Battleship 1,750,000
2033 (13) Alabama HBCU Cares 650,000
2034 (14) Motorsports Hall of Fame 200,000
2035 (15) Alabama HBCU Consortium 200,000
2036 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2037 (1) ETF 70,216,137
2038 (2) ETF-Transfer 9,935,000
2039 (3) Federal and Local Funds 7,631,058
2040 (4) Math and Science Teacher 1,000,000
2041 Education Program Funds
2042 Total Higher Education, Alabama 80,151,137 8,631,058 88,782,195
2043 Commission on
2044 In addition to the above appropriations, any scholarship funds transferred from the
2045 State Department of Education for the Alabama Teacher Recruitment Incentive Program
2046 (ATRIP) shall not revert.
2047 29. Historical Commission, Alabama :
2048 (a) Historical Resources Management 5,936,751 5,936,751
2049 Program
2050 (1) Operating Grant Program 4,000,000
Page 81

(1) Operating Grant Program 4,000,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2051 To be distributed as grants to monuments to commemorate historical events
2052 and places, historical skills centers, cultural heritage parks, historic
2053 sites, commissions, boards, agencies, and authorities that are not owned,
2054 operated, or otherwise under the control of the Alabama Historical
2055 Commission or other state agencies. Grants will be awarded to entities that
2056 reflect a historical education-based mission and concentrate on historical
2057 educational programming. Preference shall be given to: (1) any property
2058 constructed prior to 1840 that is listed in or eligible for the National
2059 Register of Historic Places and that are publicly owned and accessible to
2060 the public; or (2) any property in Alabama built in 1943 or before, and is
2061 listed in or eligible for the National Register of Historic Places or any
2062 property built after 1943 that significantly contributed to the civil rights
2063 movement. The first three grants shall be reserved for Old State Bank for
2064 $200,000, Hartselle Historical Depot for $100,000, and Mt. Pinson
2065 Presbyterian Church for $75,000. Remaining grant amounts shall not exceed
2066 $100,000 for any one entity and must be used within two years of receiving
2067 the grant. Grants will not be awarded to any entity receiving funding
2068 directly or indirectly from the Education Trust Fund or the General Fund nor
2069 may grants be awarded to any private or for-profit business or organization.
2070 a. Grants to Historical Sites 500,000
2071 A minimum of $300,000 of the grants shall be distributed to historical
2072 sites, or monuments related to the civil rights movement, as determined by
2073 the Commission.
2074 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2075 (1) ETF-Transfer 5,936,751
2076 Total Historical Commission, Alabama 5,936,751 5,936,751
2077 30. Human Resources, Department of:
2078 (a) Fostering Hope Scholarship 1,205,608 1,205,608
2079 Program
Page 82

1,205,608 1,205,608
Program
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2080 To be expended under the provisions of Sections 38-12B-1 through 38-12B-10,
2081 Code of Alabama 1975. The Department shall file a report with the Chairs of
2082 the Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, House Ways and
2083 Means-Education Committee, the Legislative Fiscal Officer and the Finance
2084 Director on October 1, 2026, regarding the total number of scholarships
2085 awarded for the Fall term of the 2025-2026 academic year and the institution
2086 attended by the scholarship recipients. The report shall also include the name
2087 of each scholarship recipient and the number of years the recipient has
2088 received a scholarship.
2089 (b) Human Services Program - Jobs 91,974,081 91,974,081
2090 Child Care and After School Child
2091 Care Program and Family and
2092 Children Services Program
2093 The Commissioner of the Department of Human Resources shall report
2094 semi-annually to the Chairs of the Senate Finance and Taxation-Education
2095 Committee, the House Ways and Means-Education Committee, Permanent Joint
2096 Legislative Committee on Finances and Budgets, the Finance Director, and the
2097 Legislative Fiscal Officer regarding the expenditure of federal stimulus funds
2098 received by the Department for Child Care and After School Care Programs. Such
2099 report shall include, but not be limited to, specific amounts expended for
2100 professional development and a summary of summer and after-school programming
2101 across the state.
2102 (1) Black Belt Eye Care Consortium 375,000
2103 (2) Bell Center 100,000
2104 (3) ASD Assessments, Services, and 500,000
2105 Therapies
2106 In collaboration with Faulkner University.
2107 (4) Educating Children at 1,000,000
2108 Residential Hospitals
2109 (5) Greater Alabama Child 926,114
2110 Development Program
Page 83

926,114
Development Program
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2111 For rural daycare.
2112 (6) Roebuck Early Childhood 75,000
2113 Learning Center
2114 (7) Summer EBT Program 10,000,000
2115 Administration
2116 (8) Wiregrass Rehabilitation 570,932
2117 Center
2118 For daycare.
2119 (9) Boys and Girls Club of Alabama 350,000
2120 Of this amount, $350,000 shall be from the Education Trust Fund and is to be
2121 expended exclusively to contract with the Boys and Girls Clubs of Alabama
2122 for TANF approved programs. The Boys and Girls Clubs of Alabama shall
2123 provide reports and/or information, per the Department's request, and/or
2124 contract to enhance accoutability of any TANF funds. The Department shall
2125 provide to the Chairs of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and
2126 the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee and the Legislative
2127 Fiscal Officer a report by the first day of the 2027 Regular Session on the
2128 individual contracts and amounts and the expenditure usage of the funds.
2129 (c) Human Services Program - Jobs 14,340,281 14,340,281
2130 Opportunities and Basic Skills
2131 Training (JOBS) Program and
2132 Family and Children Services
2133 Program
2134 (1) Child Advocacy Centers 1,850,000
2135 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2136 (1) ETF-Transfer 107,519,970
2137 Total Human Resources, Department of 107,519,970 107,519,970
Page 84

Total Human Resources, Department of 107,519,970 107,519,970
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2138 No funds from the sales tax for the issuance of food stamps shall be reverted by the
2139 Department of Human Resources to the Education Trust Fund. Any funds appropriated
2140 which are in excess of the amount needed to fund the food stamp program shall be
2141 retained by the Department and expended for direct services to children, including
2142 the TANF program.
2143 31. Law Enforcement Agency, State:
2144 (a) Department of Public Safety 336,041 336,041
2145 Program
2146 (b) State Bureau of Investigation 3,293,157 3,293,157
2147 Program
2148 (1) School Mapping 2,000,000
2149 To be expended under the provisions of Sections 16-22B-1 through 16-22B-6,
2150 Code of Alabama, 1975.
2151 (2) Precision Mobilization 650,000
2152 Technique
2153 (3) School Safety 572,446
2154 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2155 (1) ETF-Transfer 3,629,198
2156 Total Law Enforcement Agency, State 3,629,198 3,629,198
2157 32. Library Service, Alabama Public:
2158 (a) Public Library Service Program 15,023,291 3,162,662 18,185,953
2159 (1) Alabama Supreme Court Library 550,000
2160 (2) Homework Alabama 395,000
2161 (3) Public Libraries 6,600,000
2162 To be distributed to public libraries within the State. In order to receive
2163 funding from this program, the library must be in compliance with
2164 Administrative Code Rule 520-2-2-.03.
2165 (4) Virtual Library Project 3,611,637
Page 85

(4) Virtual Library Project 3,611,637
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2166 In order to receive funding from this program, the library must be in
2167 compliance with Administrative Code Rule 520-2-2-.03.
2168 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2169 (1) ETF 15,023,291
2170 (2) Federal and Local Funds 3,162,662
2171 Total Library Service, Alabama Public 15,023,291 3,162,662 18,185,953
2172 33. Marine Environmental Sciences
2173 Consortium/Dauphin Island Sea Lab:
2174 (a) Support of Other Educational 6,843,568 14,262,878 21,106,446
2175 Activities Program
2176 (1) Mississippi-Alabama Sea Grant 125,000
2177 Consortium
2178 (2) Mobile Bay National Estuary 125,000
2179 Program
2180 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2181 (1) ETF 6,843,568
2182 (2) Federal and Local Funds 14,262,878
2183 Total Marine Environmental Sciences 6,843,568 14,262,878 21,106,446
2184 Consortium/Dauphin Island Sea Lab
2185 34. Mathematics and Science, Alabama
2186 School of:
2187 (a) Financial Assistance Program 13,489,520 1,502,000 14,991,520
2188 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2189 (1) ETF 13,489,520
2190 (2) Federal and Local Funds 1,502,000
2191 Total Mathematics and Science, Alabama 13,489,520 1,502,000 14,991,520
2192 School of
2193 35. Medical Scholarship Awards, Board
2194 of:
Page 86

of:
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2195 (a) Support of Other Educational 2,440,014 1,000,000 3,440,014
2196 Activities Program
2197 The board, in determining those areas in greatest need of medical service,
2198 shall primarily be guided by information on areas that have been actively
2199 designated health professional shortage areas, through evaluation by the
2200 Office of Primary Care and Rural Health. The board shall file a report with
2201 the Chair of the Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, the Chair
2202 of the House Ways and Means-Education Committee, the Legislative Fiscal
2203 Officer and the Finance Director on October 1, 2026. The board's report shall
2204 include, if determined, where each student who has not started clinical
2205 practice has contracted to practice clinical medicine to repay his or her
2206 loans. If that area is not actively designated as a health professional
2207 shortage area, as determined by the Office of Primary Care and Rural Health,
2208 the board in its report shall state why it allowed that location as a place
2209 where that student could practice to repay his or her loans. The report shall
2210 also include the total number of scholarships awarded for the fall term of the
2211 2025-2026 academic year and the institution attended by the scholarship
2212 recipients. The report shall also include the name of each scholarship
2213 recipient and the number of years the recipient has received a scholarship
2214 and, if determined, where the recipient has contracted to practice clinical
2215 medicine to repay his or her loans. The report shall also report where
2216 contract holders were working in clinical practice to repay their loans, how
2217 many in each location, where physicians who had repaid their loans worked to
2218 do so, and how many in each location. The report also shall detail the board's
2219 budget and operating expenses for the 2025-2026 fiscal year.
2220 (1) Alabama Physician Assistants 500,000
2221 Service Program (Loan
2222 Repayment)
Page 87

500,000
Repayment)
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2223 To be expended under the provisions of Sections 16-47-220 through 16-47-225,
2224 Code of Alabama 1975. The Board shall file a report with the Chairs of the
2225 Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, House Ways and
2226 Means-Education Committee, the Legislative Fiscal Officer and the Finance
2227 Director on October 1, 2026, regarding the expenditures and the condition
2228 and accomplishments of the program, including start-up preparations.
2229 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2230 (1) ETF 2,440,014
2231 (2) Federal and Local Funds 1,000,000
2232 Total Medical Scholarship Awards, Board 2,440,014 1,000,000 3,440,014
2233 of
2234 36. Mental Health, Department of:
2235 (a) Institutional Treatment and Care 57,706,719 57,706,719
2236 of Intellectually Disabled
2237 Program
2238 (1) ARC-type Community-based 4,282,409
2239 Programs
2240 To fund ARC-type community-based programs pursuant to a formula developed
2241 by the Department of Mental Health. Any ARC program receiving funds for the
2242 first time in fiscal year 2027 shall receive a minimum of $50,000.
2243 (2) Camp ASCCA 540,000
2244 (3) Developmental Disability Nurse 800,000
2245 Delegation Program
2246 (4) Eagles' Wings Program 625,000
2247 (5) Rainbow Omega 625,000
2248 (6) Residential Habilitation 960,000
2249 (7) Community Provider Rate 6,750,000
2250 Increases
2251 (8) Hilinski's Hope Program 250,000
Page 88

(8) Hilinski's Hope Program 250,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2252 To provide mental health support for students through courses on mental
2253 health literacy, help-seeking, and bystander intervention.
2254 (b) Institutional Treatment and Care 16,483,540 16,483,540
2255 of Mental Illness Program
2256 (1) School-Based Mental Health 5,500,000
2257 Services Collaboration
2258 (2) Community Provider Rate 3,000,000
2259 Increases
2260 (3) For services to Children and 4,750,000
2261 Youth with Severe Emotional
2262 Disturbance or Autism Spectrum
2263 Disorder
2264 To be used for services to children and youth with severe emotional
2265 disturbance or autism spectrum disorder. The ETF funding provided in this
2266 act shall be combined with funding provided in the State General Fund
2267 appropriations act so that a total of at least $11,000,000 in state funds is
2268 allocated for services to those children and youth.
2269 (c) Special Services Program 7,024,436 7,024,436
2270 (1) Alabama Interagency Autism 438,900
2271 Coordinating Council
2272 a. Regional Centers 225,000
2273 (d) Substance Abuse Program 2,892,794 2,892,794
2274 (1) Community Provider Rate 1,000,000
2275 Increases
2276 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2277 (1) ETF-Transfer 84,107,489
2278 Total Mental Health, Department of 84,107,489 84,107,489
Page 89

Total Mental Health, Department of 84,107,489 84,107,489
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2279 Of the above appropriation to the Department of Mental Health a portion shall be
2280 used to develop and implement best practices and strategies, in conjunction with the
2281 State Department of Education, designed to address the mental health needs,
2282 including attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder and other anger disorders, of
2283 children and adolescents in public schools.
2284 37. Music Hall of Fame:
2285 (a) Fine Arts Program 214,127 330,000 544,127
2286 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2287 (1) ETF 214,127
2288 (2) Music Hall of Fame Fund, 330,000
2289 Estimated
2290 Total Music Hall of Fame 214,127 330,000 544,127
2291 38. Nursing, Alabama Board of:
2292 (a) Professional and Occupational 766,027 13,080,547 13,846,574
2293 Licensing and Regulation Program
2294 The above appropriation shall be expended pursuant to the provisions of
2295 Sections 34-21-60 through 34-21-63, Code of Alabama 1975.
2296 (1) Advanced Degrees Scholarships 150,000
2297 For scholarships for advanced degrees to train instructors to teach nursing
2298 classes in Alabama colleges and universities, notwithstanding the limiting
2299 provisions of Sections 34-21-60 through 34-21-63, Code of Alabama 1975.
2300 (2) Loan Repayment Program 450,000
Page 90

(2) Loan Repayment Program 450,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2301 For a loan repayment program for advanced-practice nurses, notwithstanding
2302 the limiting provisions of Sections 34-21-60 through 34-21-63, Code of
2303 Alabama 1975. The Board shall file a report with the Chairs of the Senate
2304 Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, House Ways and Means-Education
2305 Committee, the Legislative Fiscal Officer and the Finance Director by
2306 October 1, 2026, regarding the total number of scholarships and loans
2307 awarded for the Fall term of the 2025-2026 academic year and the institution
2308 attended by the scholarship and loan recipients. The report shall also
2309 include the name of each scholarship and loan recipient and the number of
2310 years the recipient has received a scholarship or loan.
2311 (3) Advanced Practice Nurse Loan 150,000
2312 Program
2313 For a loan repayment program for advanced-practice nurses, notwithstanding
2314 the limiting provisions of Sections 34-21-150 through 34-21-155, Code of
2315 Alabama 1975. The Board shall file a report with the Chairs of the Senate
2316 Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, House Ways and Means-Education
2317 Committee, the Legislative Fiscal Officer and the Finance Director by
2318 October 1, 2026, regarding the total number of scholarships and loans
2319 awarded for the Fall term of the 2025-2026 academic year and the institution
2320 attended by the scholarship and loan recipients. The report shall also
2321 include the name of each scholarship and loan recipient and the number of
2322 years the recipient has received a scholarship or loan.
2323 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2324 (1) ETF 766,027
2325 (2) Alabama Board of Nursing Trust 13,080,547
2326 Fund
2327 Total Nursing, Alabama Board of 766,027 13,080,547 13,846,574
2328 39. Optometric Scholarship Awards,
2329 Board of:
Page 91

Board of:
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2330 (a) Support of Other Educational 200,000 50,000 250,000
2331 Activities Program
2332 To be expended under the provisions of Sections 34-22-60 through 34-22-65,
2333 Code of Alabama 1975.
2334 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2335 (1) ETF 200,000
2336 (2) Optometric Scholarship Award Fund 50,000
2337 Total Optometric Scholarship Awards, 200,000 50,000 250,000
2338 Board of
2339 40. Peace Officers' Standards and
2340 Training Commission, Alabama:
2341 (a) Professional and Occupational 261,089 1,945,929 2,207,018
2342 Licensing and Regulation Program
2343 (b) Certified Law Enforcement Academy 2,162,000 1,000,000 3,162,000
2344 Program
2345 (1) Regional Training Academies 2,162,000
2346 To be allocated to the five regional training academies, consistent with the
2347 provisions of Section 36-21-47.1, Code of Alabama 1975, in a fair and
2348 equitable manner.
2349 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2350 (1) ETF 2,423,089
2351 (2) Alabama Peace Officers' Standards 2,945,929
2352 and Training Fund - as provided
2353 in Sections 36-21-40 through
2354 36-21-51, Code of Alabama 1975
2355 Total Peace Officers' Standards and 2,423,089 2,945,929 5,369,018
2356 Training Commission, Alabama
2357 41. Physical Fitness, State Commission
2358 on:
2359 (a) Advisory Services Program 2,776,631 5,288 2,781,919
Page 92

(a) Advisory Services Program 2,776,631 5,288 2,781,919
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2360 (1) Alabama Sports Council 607,260
2361 (2) Alabama Sports Festival 1,105,467
2362 (3) Alabama Sports Hall of Fame 700,000
2363 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2364 (1) ETF 2,776,631
2365 (2) Federal and Local Funds 5,288
2366 Total Physical Fitness, State 2,776,631 5,288 2,781,919
2367 Commission on
2368 42. Public Education Employee Injury
2369 Compensation Board:
2370 (a) Public Education Employee Injury 6,000,000 6,000,000
2371 Compensation Program
2372 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2373 (1) ETF-Transfer 6,000,000
2374 Total Public Education Employee Injury 6,000,000 6,000,000
2375 Compensation Board
2376 43. Rehabilitation Services, Department
2377 of:
2378 (a) Direct Client Services for the 69,384,564 223,374,952 292,759,516
2379 Handicapped Program
2380 (1) Alabama Head and Spinal Cord 1,000,000
2381 Injury
2382 (2) Children's Rehabilitation 12,050,611
2383 Services
2384 Of the above appropriation, the agency will pay to each hospital the
2385 standard per diem paid by the Alabama Medicaid Agency for services relating
2386 to scoliosis and spina bifida medical care.
2387 (3) Disability Resource Network 150,000
2388 (4) Early Intervention Program 14,690,685
Page 93

(4) Early Intervention Program 14,690,685
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2389 (5) Education of Dependents of 10,399
2390 Blind Parents
2391 The above appropriation shall be allocated for reimbursement to every state
2392 institution of higher learning, college, university, community college, or
2393 junior college, in which benefits are given to dependents of blind parents
2394 under the provisions of Sections 16-33-1 through 16-33-12, Code of Alabama
2395 1975.
2396 (6) Hemophilia 1,289,809
2397 (7) Homebound 8,645,509
2398 (8) Rehabilitation Services 24,056,790
2399 a. Teaching Children With 128,213
2400 Disabilities
2401 (9) Respite Related Services and 315,000
2402 Training
2403 (10) Exceptional Foundation 150,000
2404 (11) Physician-Assisted Autism 1,900,000
2405 Diagnostic (PAAD) Clinic Models
2406 For statewide autism assessments.
2407 (12) Rehabilitation Projects 2,110,631
2408 (13) Traumatic Brain Injury Program 2,552,442
2409 (14) United Ability 100,000
2410 (15) UCP Mobile 100,000
2411 (16) Alabama Office on Disability 162,688
2412 (17) UCP Huntsville 100,000
2413 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2414 (1) ETF 68,384,564
2415 (2) ETF-Transfer 1,000,000
2416 (3) Alabama Head and Spinal Cord 1,000,000
2417 Injury Trust Fund
Page 94

1,000,000
Injury Trust Fund
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2418 (4) Federal and Local Funds 222,374,952
2419 Total Rehabilitation Services, 69,384,564 223,374,952 292,759,516
2420 Department of
2421 The above appropriation to the Department of Rehabilitation Services -
2422 Rehabilitation Projects may be used to contract with providers of cerebral palsy
2423 services.
2424 44. Revenue, Department of:
2425 (a) Education Savings Account Program 86,250,000 150,000,000 236,250,000
2426 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2427 (1) ETF 1,250,000
2428 (2) ETF-Transfer 85,000,000
2429 (3) CHOOSE Act Fund, Estimated 150,000,000
2430 Total Revenue, Department of 86,250,000 150,000,000 236,250,000
2431 45. Sickle Cell Oversight and
2432 Regulatory Commission, Alabama :
2433 (a) Support of Other Educational 2,131,613 2,131,613
2434 Activities Program
2435 (1) Commission Travel and Other 60,973
2436 Expenses
2437 (2) University and Community-based 2,070,640
2438 Sickle Cell Programs
2439 To fund university and community-based Sickle Cell programs which were
2440 funded from the ETF budget in fiscal year 2000. These funds shall be
2441 distributed proportionately to the distribution made in fiscal year 2003.
2442 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2443 (1) ETF 2,131,613
2444 Total Sickle Cell Oversight and 2,131,613 2,131,613
2445 Regulatory Commission, Alabama
2446 46. Supercomputer Authority, Alabama :
Page 95

46. Supercomputer Authority, Alabama :
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2447 (a) Information Technology Services 23,973,106 6,652,703 30,625,809
2448 Program
2449 The above appropriation is to be expended in accordance with Sections
2450 41-10-390 through 41-10-406, Code of Alabama 1975.
2451 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2452 (1) ETF-Transfer 23,973,106
2453 (2) Supercomputer Revolving Fund, 6,652,703
2454 Estimated
2455 Total Supercomputer Authority, Alabama 23,973,106 6,652,703 30,625,809
2456 47. U.S. Space and Rocket Center
2457 Commission (Formerly Space Science
2458 Exhibit Commission, Alabama):
2459 (a) Special Services Program 3,700,000 46,055,969 49,755,969
2460 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2461 (1) ETF 3,700,000
2462 (2) Federal and Local Funds 46,055,969
2463 Total U.S. Space and Rocket Center 3,700,000 46,055,969 49,755,969
2464 Commission (Formerly Space Science
2465 Exhibit Commission, Alabama)
2466 48. Veterans Affairs, Department of:
2467 (a) Administration of Veteran's 2,896,956 2,896,956
2468 Affairs Program
2469 (b) Student Financial Aid Program, 50,000,000 50,000,000
2470 Estimated
2471 For reimbursement to every state institution of higher learning, college,
2472 university, community college, junior college or technical college in which
2473 benefits are given to veterans, their spouses, widows, or children under the
2474 provisions of Sections 31-6-1 through 31-6-17, Code of Alabama 1975.
2475 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2476 (1) ETF 52,896,956
Page 96

(1) ETF 52,896,956
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2477 Total Veterans Affairs, Department of 52,896,956 52,896,956
2478 49. Workforce, Alabama Department of:
2479 (a) Industrial Development Program 19,915,000 19,915,000
2480 (1) STEM Council 5,200,000
2481 The above appropriation shall be used for regional STEM hub grants as well
2482 as communicating STEM programs; increasing STEM awareness; developing and
2483 implanting the Governor’s STEM Seal of Approval; developing and maintaining
2484 a STEM digital registry; evaluating state-funded STEM initiatives; expanding
2485 opportunities for STEM exploration; determining STEM workforce needs and
2486 promoting in-demand STEM careers, as provided in Act 2025-449.
2487 a. Microschool Grant Program 500,000
2488 The Alabama STEM Council within the Department of Workforce shall design and
2489 implement a program to provide startup grants to microschools and to
2490 organizations that train microschool founders in order to support the launch
2491 of new microschools. A report shall be submitted by the fifth day of the
2492 2027 Regular Session which includes a geographic breakdown of first-year
2493 schools funded as well as individual school enrollment as of January 1,
2494 2027. The department may contract with a third party for the administration
2495 of the program.
2496 (2) Alabama Advanced 500,000
2497 Transportation Readiness
2498 Initiative
2499 (3) Alabama Workforce Board 2,600,000
2500 To manage the Alabama Credential Registry, to develop the annual Compendium
2501 of Valuable Credentials by using the two-tiered non-degree credential
2502 quality assurance review process established in the bylaws of the Alabama
2503 Committee on Credentialing and Career Pathways, and to provide technical
2504 assistance to credential providers in registering credentials to the Alabama
2505 Credential Registry.
Page 97

Credential Registry.
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2506 (4) Alabama Office of 3,315,000
2507 Apprenticeship
2508 (5) Marketing Campaign for 900,000
2509 Technical Education
2510 (6) Data Information and Retention 900,000
2511 Program (Formerly Talent Triad)
2512 (7) Focused Talent Retention 400,000
2513 Initiative
2514 (8) Forest Worker Training 500,000
2515 Institute
2516 For logging operation equipment and training.
2517 (9) Huntsville Hospital Health 2,500,000
2518 System
2519 For workforce development for in-demand health professionals.
2520 (10) Individual Training Accounts 300,000
2521 Pilot Program
2522 (11) Rural Transportation Program 300,000
2523 (12) Veteran's Resources Center 300,000
2524 (13) Workforce Piloting Solutions 750,000
2525 (14) Workforce Program Enhancements 1,450,000
2526 (b) Skills Enhancement and Employment 2,341,600 74,500,000 76,841,600
2527 Opportunities Program
2528 (c) Administrative Services Program 7,000,000 7,000,000
2529 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2530 (1) ETF 29,256,600
2531 (2) Federal and Local Funds 74,500,000
2532 Total Workforce, Alabama Department of 29,256,600 74,500,000 103,756,600
2533 50. Youth Services, Department of:
Page 98

50. Youth Services, Department of:
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2534 (a) Financial Assistance Program 8,522,182 8,522,182
2535 (School District)
2536 The above appropriation shall be expended by the Youth Services Department
2537 School District in a manner consistent with the funding formula cooperatively
2538 established by the Youth Services Board and the State Board of Education
2539 pursuant to the provisions of Sections 44-1-70 through 44-1-78, Code of
2540 Alabama 1975.
2541 (b) Youth Services Program 55,243,328 55,243,328
2542 (c) Special Programming for 3,565,732 3,565,732
2543 Achievement Network (SPAN)
2544 Program
2545 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2546 (1) ETF-Transfer 67,331,242
2547 Total Youth Services, Department of 67,331,242 67,331,242
2548 It is the intent of the Legislature for the Department of Youth Services to ensure
2549 that each step of each salary schedule for each type of education support personnel
2550 provides an hourly rate of not less than $15 per hour, based on the number of
2551 contract days and number of hours per day required by the job description for that
2552 class and type of employee.
2553 C. Colleges and Universities:
2554 1. Alabama Agricultural and Mechanical
2555 University, Board of Trustees:
2556 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 58,331,184 104,319,143 162,650,327
2557 Program Support
2558 (1) Artificial Intelligence, 125,000
2559 Cybersecurity and STEM
2560 Enhancements
2561 (2) State Black Archives Research 600,000
2562 Center and Museum
Page 99

600,000
Center and Museum
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2563 To be allocated equally among the State Black Archives Center and Museum,
2564 Scottsboro Boys Museum, and Judge Horton Civil Justice Learning Center.
2565 (b) Extension-Urban Affairs and 4,084,765 4,084,765
2566 Non-Traditional Land Grant
2567 Programs
2568 Pursuant to Knight v. Alabama Final Settlement Agreement.
2569 (c) Agricultural Research Station 432,285 432,285
2570 Fixed Costs
2571 Pursuant to Knight v. Alabama Final Settlement Agreement.
2572 (d) Auxiliary Enterprises 34,612,894 34,612,894
2573 (e) Restricted Funds 55,151,763 55,151,763
2574 (f) Agricultural Research and 1,305,883 1,305,883
2575 Extension-State Match
2576 (g) The Virginia Caples Learning 100,000 100,000
2577 Living Institute
2578 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2579 (1) ETF 64,254,117
2580 (2) Federal and Other Funds 194,083,800
2581 Total Alabama Agricultural and 64,254,117 194,083,800 258,337,917
2582 Mechanical University, Board of
2583 Trustees
2584 2. Alabama A and M University, Board
2585 of Trustees-Miles College
2586 Consortium:
2587 (a) Alabama A and M University-Miles 493,486 493,486
2588 College Consortium
2589 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2590 (1) ETF 493,486
2591 Total Alabama A and M University, Board 493,486 493,486
2592 of Trustees-Miles College Consortium
Page 100

493,486 493,486
of Trustees-Miles College Consortium
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2593 3. Alabama State University, Board of
2594 Trustees:
2595 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 69,335,841 76,578,182 145,914,023
2596 Program Support
2597 (1) Alabama Department of Forensic 100,000
2598 Sciences
2599 $25,000 per quarter shall be transferred to the Alabama Department of
2600 Forensic Sciences - Forensic Services Trust Fund for the building occupied
2601 by the department at the Alabama State University campus.
2602 (b) Auxiliary Enterprises 19,474,816 19,474,816
2603 (c) Restricted Funds 30,245,541 30,245,541
2604 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2605 (1) ETF 69,335,841
2606 (2) Federal and Other Funds 126,298,539
2607 Total Alabama State University, Board 69,335,841 126,298,539 195,634,380
2608 of Trustees
2609 4. Alabama, The University of, Board
2610 of Trustees:
2611 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 284,765,168 1,017,406,959 1,302,172,127
2612 Program Support for the
2613 University of Alabama at
2614 Tuscaloosa
2615 (1) Alabama Small Business 961,600
2616 Development Centers
2617 (2) Alabama Transportation 6,000,000
2618 Research
2619 (3) Institute for Automotive 1,000,000
2620 Engineering
2621 (4) Rural Health Care Program 600,000
Page 101

(4) Rural Health Care Program 600,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2622 (5) State of Alabama Water 1,360,000
2623 Resource Center
2624 (b) Operations and Maintenance and 439,340,008 5,033,457,590 5,472,797,598
2625 Program Support for the
2626 University of Alabama at
2627 Birmingham
2628 (1) Alabama Drug Discovery 1,400,000
2629 Alliance
2630 In collaboration with the Southern Research Institute.
2631 (2) Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis 750,000
2632 (ALS) Clinic
2633 (3) Center for Clinical and 500,000
2634 Transitional Science
2635 (4) Genome Alabama 2,000,000
2636 In collaboration with the Hudson Alpha Institute.
2637 (5) High School and Middle School 556,765
2638 Athletic Training Programs
2639 (6) Underserved Communities Dental 201,473
2640 Program
2641 (7) Rural Hospitals Resource 1,250,000
2642 Center
2643 (8) School of Optometry 250,000
2644 (9) UAB School of Medicine-Central 500,000
2645 Alabama Regional Campus
2646 (10) University of Alabama at 5,052,527
2647 Birmingham Cancer Center
Page 102

5,052,527
Birmingham Cancer Center
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2648 (c) Operations and Maintenance and 81,713,659 141,106,395 222,820,054
2649 Program Support for the
2650 University of Alabama in
2651 Huntsville
2652 (1) Alabama Office of the State 850,000
2653 Climatologist
2654 (2) Redstone Research Retention 2,700,000
2655 Program
2656 (3) Space Grant Consortium 200,000
2657 (d) Special Mental Health and 4,236,628 4,236,628
2658 Chauncey Sparks Center for
2659 Developmental and Learning
2660 Disorders, University of Alabama
2661 at Birmingham
2662 (e) Auxiliary Enterprises 349,720,516 349,720,516
2663 (f) Restricted Funds 854,158,184 854,158,184
2664 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2665 (1) ETF 810,055,463
2666 (2) Federal and Other Funds 7,395,849,644
2667 Total Alabama, The University of, Board 810,055,463 7,395,849,644 8,205,905,107
2668 of Trustees
2669 5. Athens State University, Board of
2670 Trustees:
2671 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 24,650,048 25,896,523 50,546,571
2672 Program Support
2673 (1) Arts Center 431,455
2674 (2) Center for Excellence in 325,000
2675 Education Development
Page 103

325,000
Education Development
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2676 (3) Collaboration Program with the 275,000
2677 Alabama Community College
2678 System
2679 (4) Smart Valley Program 150,000
2680 (b) Auxiliary Enterprises 900,000 900,000
2681 (c) Restricted Funds 26,418,028 26,418,028
2682 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2683 (1) ETF 24,650,048
2684 (2) Federal and Other Funds 53,214,551
2685 Total Athens State University, Board of 24,650,048 53,214,551 77,864,599
2686 Trustees
2687 6. Auburn University, Board of
2688 Trustees:
2689 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 309,494,633 973,969,857 1,283,464,490
2690 Program Support, Auburn
2691 University
2692 (1) Allied Health Initiative 200,000
2693 (2) CLT Outreach and Research 700,000
2694 The above appropriation for CLT Outreach and Research shall be used for
2695 capital expenses and equipment and shall not be used for salaries and
2696 benefits.
2697 (3) College of Architecture, 500,000
2698 Design and Construction
2699 (4) McCrary Institute 1,000,000
2700 (5) National Livestock Competition 250,000
2701 Coordinator
2702 For the recruitment and retention of a National Livestock Competition
2703 Coordinator for the College of Agriculture.
2704 (6) Poultry Science Department 250,000
Page 104

(6) Poultry Science Department 250,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2705 (7) Irrigation Research and 500,000
2706 Outreach Initiative
2707 (8) Applied Research Initiatives 500,000
2708 (b) Operations and Maintenance and 46,031,398 6,451,500 52,482,898
2709 Program Support, Alabama
2710 Agricultural Experiment Station
2711 (c) Operations and Maintenance and 48,466,499 1,739,228 50,205,727
2712 Program Support, Alabama
2713 Cooperative Extension System
2714 (1) 4-H Youth Development 125,000
2715 Agricultural and Animal
2716 Sciences Extension Specialist
2717 (d) Operations and Maintenance and 36,598,473 53,485,227 90,083,700
2718 Program Support, Auburn
2719 University at Montgomery
2720 (1) Senior Resource Center 114,915
2721 (e) Restricted Funds 303,013,668 303,013,668
2722 (f) Auxiliary Enterprises 285,453,550 285,453,550
2723 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2724 (1) ETF 440,591,003
2725 (2) Federal and Other Funds 1,624,113,030
2726 Total Auburn University, Board of 440,591,003 1,624,113,030 2,064,704,033
2727 Trustees
2728 7. Jacksonville State University,
2729 Board of Trustees:
2730 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 66,543,021 130,913,380 197,456,401
2731 Program Support
2732 (1) Center for Applied Forensics 500,000
2733 (2) Center for Law Enforcement 475,000
2734 Best Practices
Page 105

475,000
Best Practices
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2735 (3) Center for Manufacturing 700,000
2736 Support
2737 (4) Economic Development 675,000
2738 Initiative for the Alabama
2739 Scenic River Trail
2740 (5) Little River Canyon Field 450,000
2741 School
2742 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any amount
2743 appropriated to Jacksonville State University for the Little River Canyon
2744 Field School, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, which is
2745 unexpended shall remain at Jacksonville State University to be expended for
2746 the Little River Canyon Field School.
2747 (6) Correctional Professional 150,000
2748 Training
2749 (7) Paint Rock Valley Genetic 420,000
2750 Research
2751 (8) Sweet Trails Alabama 935,000
2752 (b) Auxiliary Enterprises 26,641,858 26,641,858
2753 (c) Restricted Funds 83,690,040 83,690,040
2754 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2755 (1) ETF 66,543,021
2756 (2) Federal and Other Funds 241,245,278
2757 Total Jacksonville State University, 66,543,021 241,245,278 307,788,299
2758 Board of Trustees
2759 8. Montevallo, University of, Board of
2760 Trustees:
2761 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 34,874,394 41,687,007 76,561,401
2762 Program Support
2763 (1) Allied Health 1,500,000
Page 106

(1) Allied Health 1,500,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2764 (2) Purchase Books and Materials 50,000
2765 for Disadvantaged Students
2766 (3) Rural Teacher Recruitment 350,000
2767 (4) Mental and Physical Health 50,000
2768 Initiatives
2769 (b) Auxiliary Enterprises 11,964,769 11,964,769
2770 (c) Restricted Funds 6,826,461 6,826,461
2771 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2772 (1) ETF 34,874,394
2773 (2) Federal and Other Funds 60,478,237
2774 Total Montevallo, University of, Board 34,874,394 60,478,237 95,352,631
2775 of Trustees
2776 9. North Alabama, University of, Board
2777 of Trustees:
2778 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 61,435,950 111,850,888 173,286,838
2779 Program Support
2780 (1) Yellowhammer Outdoors 500,000
2781 (b) Auxiliary Enterprises 22,774,971 22,774,971
2782 (c) Restricted Funds 3,953,817 3,953,817
2783 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2784 (1) ETF 61,435,950
2785 (2) Federal and Other Funds 138,579,676
2786 Total North Alabama, University of, 61,435,950 138,579,676 200,015,626
2787 Board of Trustees
2788 10. South Alabama, University of, Board
2789 of Trustees:
2790 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 184,001,844 1,266,502,059 1,450,503,903
2791 Program Support
2792 (1) ALS Center for Excellence 750,000
Page 107

(1) ALS Center for Excellence 750,000
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2793 (2) Rural Hospitals Resource 1,250,000
2794 Center
2795 (3) USA Trauma Center 3,000,000
2796 (b) Auxiliary Enterprises 36,327,203 36,327,203
2797 (c) Restricted Funds 102,600,000 102,600,000
2798 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2799 (1) ETF 184,001,844
2800 (2) Federal and Other Funds 1,405,429,262
2801 Total South Alabama, University of, 184,001,844 1,405,429,262 1,589,431,106
2802 Board of Trustees
2803 11. Troy University, Board of Trustees:
2804 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 92,920,654 162,352,138 255,272,792
2805 Program Support
2806 (1) Dothan Pre-K Teacher Training 475,000
2807 Center
2808 (2) Sign Language Interpretive 450,000
2809 Center
2810 (3) Center for Civics Education 1,000,000
2811 and Leadership
2812 (4) Civics Partnership 750,000
2813 In collaboration with American Village.
2814 (5) College of Engineering 1,200,000
2815 (b) Auxiliary Enterprises 22,219,738 22,219,738
2816 (c) Restricted Funds 41,590,845 41,590,845
2817 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2818 (1) ETF 92,920,654
2819 (2) Federal and Other Funds 226,162,721
2820 Total Troy University, Board of 92,920,654 226,162,721 319,083,375
2821 Trustees
Page 108

92,920,654 226,162,721 319,083,375
Trustees
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2822 12. West Alabama, University of, Board
2823 of Trustees:
2824 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 37,331,748 54,551,903 91,883,651
2825 Program Support
2826 (1) Blackbelt Scholars Program 750,000
2827 (2) Cahaba Biodiversity Center 225,000
2828 (3) National Young Farmers 50,000
2829 (4) Rural Workforce Development 400,000
2830 (5) Women's Hall of Fame 10,000
2831 (b) Auxiliary Enterprises 6,801,185 6,801,185
2832 (c) Restricted Funds 705,864 705,864
2833 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2834 (1) ETF 37,331,748
2835 (2) Federal and Other Funds 62,058,952
2836 Total West Alabama, University of, 37,331,748 62,058,952 99,390,700
2837 Board of Trustees
2838 13. West Alabama, University of, Board
2839 of Trustees-Stillman College:
2840 (a) University of West 200,000 200,000
2841 Alabama-Stillman College
2842 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2843 (1) ETF 200,000
2844 Total West Alabama, University of, 200,000 200,000
2845 Board of Trustees-Stillman College
2846 D. Alabama Innovation Fund:
2847 1. Alabama Innovation Fund:
2848 (a) Alabama Innovation Fund 28,170,133 28,170,133
Page 109

(a) Alabama Innovation Fund 28,170,133 28,170,133
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2849 The above appropriation shall be used for economic development and research
2850 purposes recommended by the Secretary of the Alabama Department of Commerce
2851 and approved by the Governor. The Secretary of the Department of Commerce
2852 shall notify the Chairs of the Senate Finance and Taxation-Education Committee
2853 and the House Ways and Means-Education Committee in writing at least 10 days
2854 prior to the disbursement of any funds. Such notification shall include the
2855 project description and the amount to be disbursed.
2856 (1) Innovate Alabama 20,000,000
2857 (2) Neurological Research Project 1,000,000
2858 (3) Hudson Alpha Institute for 1,000,000
2859 Biotechnology
2860 (4) Small Business Innovation 5,000,000
2861 Research and Small Business
2862 Technology Matching Grants
2863 Pursuant to the provisions of Article 21 of Chapter 10 of Title 41.
2864 (5) Southern Research Institute 750,000
2865 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2866 (1) ETF 28,170,133
2867 Total Alabama Innovation Fund 28,170,133 28,170,133
2868 E. Other:
2869 1. Deaf and Blind, Alabama Institute
2870 for, Board of Trustees:
2871 (a) Adult Programs 18,892,952 10,718,053 29,611,005
2872 (1) Birmingham Regional Office 10,000
2873 (b) Children and Youth Programs 53,175,088 16,568,112 69,743,200
2874 (c) Industries for the Blind 13,524,419 27,394,000 40,918,419
2875 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2876 (1) ETF 85,592,459
2877 (2) Federal and Local Funds 54,680,165
Page 110

(2) Federal and Local Funds 54,680,165
HB238 Enrolled
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2878 Total Deaf and Blind, Alabama Institute 85,592,459 54,680,165 140,272,624
2879 for, Board of Trustees
2880 It is the intent of the Legislature for the Alabama Institute for the Deaf and Blind
2881 to ensure that each step of each salary schedule for each type of educational
2882 classroom support personnel provides an hourly rate of not less than $15 per hour,
2883 based on the number of contract days and number of hours per day required by the job
2884 description for that class and type of employee.
2885
Page 111

HB238 Enrolled
2886
2887 Section 4. It is the intent of the Legislature that
2888 any institution accepting funds appropriated in this bill do
2889 so contingent upon their compliance with the provisions of
2890 Article 6, Chapter 1, of Title 41, Code of Alabama 1975.
2891 Section 5. In addition to the appropriations herein
2892 made, all gifts, grants, contributions, insurance proceeds or
2893 entitlements, in excess of the amount carried in this act,
2894 including grants by the Congress of the United States,
2895 municipalities or counties, to any department, division,
2896 board, bureau, commission, agency, institution, office or
2897 officer of the State of Alabama are hereby appropriated and,
2898 in the event the same are recurring, are reappropriated to
2899 such department, division, board, bureau, commission, agency,
2900 institution, office, or officer to be used only for the
2901 purpose or purposes for which the grant or contribution was or
2902 shall be made. Further, all state, county, municipal, and
2903 educational entities are authorized to disburse such sums as
2904 deemed necessary by mutual agreement between said entities and
2905 the State of Alabama, Department of Examiners of Public
2906 Accounts to partially defray the cost of auditing services
2907 performed by said agency. All such sums are hereby
2908 appropriated and reappropriated if necessary to the Department
2909 of Examiners of Public Accounts for audit services, to be
Page 112

of Examiners of Public Accounts for audit services, to be
HB238 Enrolled
2910 expended through the fund established by Section 41-5A-22,
2911 Code of Alabama 1975.
2912 Section 6. The State Superintendent of Education shall
2913 make requisitions to the State Comptroller in favor of the
2914 proper beneficiary in accordance with the law and rules and
2915 regulations governing the expenditure or disbursement of any
2916 and all funds appropriated to the State Department of
2917 Education and/or the State Board of Education in this act,
2918 whereupon the Comptroller shall issue her warrant therefor.
2919 All other appropriations in this act shall be paid after
2920 proper requisitions are made to the State Comptroller in the
2921 manner now provided by law.
2922 Section 7. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
2923 affect or repeal any law authorizing or permitting any
2924 college, school, or other education or eleemosynary
2925 institution of the State to receive, collect or disburse any
2926 fees, tuitions, charges, sales, endowments, trusts or income
2927 therefrom, which are now or may hereafter be authorized to
2928 receive, collect, or disburse. The receiving college, school
2929 or institution shall further maintain separate accounts for
2930 such receipts or shall maintain a system of accounting which
2931 will show a cash flow of such receipts received under the
2932 provision of this appropriation.
2933 Section 8. The appropriations made herein to the
2934 departments, boards, offices, commissions, and agencies
2935 include the amounts necessary and said departments, boards,
2936 offices, commissions, and agencies are hereby directed to make
Page 113

offices, commissions, and agencies are hereby directed to make
HB238 Enrolled
2937 the transfer of funds to the State Personnel Department in the
2938 amounts enumerated in the general appropriations act for the
2939 fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. All agencies and
2940 institutions enumerated in this act that receive services from
2941 other governmental agencies enumerated in this act or the
2942 general appropriations act shall make full payment in a timely
2943 manner for such services.
2944 Section 9. All encumbered balances of a previous
2945 fiscal year appropriation other than the exclusions authorized
2946 by the Code of Alabama 1975, Section 41-4-93, shall lapse no
2947 later than September 30 of the fiscal year immediately
2948 following the fiscal year for which the appropriation was made
2949 and shall revert to the credit of the Education Trust Fund or
2950 earmarked fund from which the appropriation or appropriations
2951 were made.
2952 Section 10. Upon certification to the Director of
2953 Finance by the State Attorney General that a federal court has
2954 ordered the State of Alabama to pay claims, attorney fees, or
2955 other costs relating to said court order, funds are hereby
2956 appropriated to the affected department, board, bureau, or
2957 commission in the amount necessary to satisfy that court
2958 order. Such appropriations are in addition to any other
2959 appropriation heretofore or hereafter made in this
2960 appropriation act. Such appropriations are conditioned upon
2961 the availability of funds and a determination by the Director
2962 of Finance that other current appropriations are not available
2963 for court-ordered payments.
Page 114

for court-ordered payments.
HB238 Enrolled
2964 Section 11. Local boards of education may exercise
2965 flexibility among line item expenditures, not to create a
2966 reduction of earned teacher units and/or local board of
2967 education support personnel.
2968 Section 12. The State Superintendent of Education may
2969 approve a request by a local board of education for
2970 redirecting Other Current Expense funds designated for
2971 pass-through calculations to their local Child Nutrition
2972 Program if the redirected funds do not prevent the Child
2973 Nutrition Program of that local board of education from
2974 maintaining a one-month fund balance.
2975 Section 13. The appropriations made herein to the
2976 departments, boards, offices, commissions, and agencies
2977 include the amounts necessary to pay the State Employees'
2978 Insurance Board (SEIB). The SEIB rate shall be $1,175 per
2979 month for each full-time employee for the fiscal year ending
2980 September 30, 2027. The State Employees' Insurance Board will
2981 adjust the insurance program wherever appropriate to maintain
2982 the aforementioned fixed rate.
2983 Section 14. Notwithstanding any other provisions of
2984 this act or any other act, any amount from appropriations for
2985 the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026 to the various state
2986 agencies and institutions in this act, including
2987 appropriations from the Education Trust Fund, which are
2988 unexpended and reverted on September 30, 2026 are hereby
2989 reappropriated to the respective state agencies, offices, and
2990 institutions for the fiscal year beginning October 1, 2026.
Page 115

institutions for the fiscal year beginning October 1, 2026.
HB238 Enrolled
2991 Section 15. The At-Risk and High Hopes appropriations
2992 made to the State Department of Education shall be expended at
2993 the discretion of the State Superintendent of Education, with
2994 input from other Alabama State Department of Education
2995 advisory personnel, for activities or programs designed to
2996 enhance outcomes for At-Risk Students. In an effort to provide
2997 the best and most efficient implementation, administration of
2998 the funds shall be assigned to and allocated by the Alabama
2999 State Department of Education's Division of Administrative and
3000 Financial Support.
3001 Section 16. (a) All nongovernmental entities,
3002 identified by the Legislative Services Agency, which are
3003 allocated funds in Section 3 of this act shall file a report
3004 with the Chairs of the House Ways and Means-Education
3005 Committee, the Senate Committee on Finance and
3006 Taxation-Education, Finance Director, and the Legislative
3007 Fiscal Officer prior to the start of the 2027 Regular Session,
3008 regarding the proposed expenditures and usage of the funds
3009 appropriated in the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. The
3010 Legislative Services Agency shall provide notice to the
3011 identified nongovernmental entities within 60 days following
3012 enactment of this act regarding the reporting requirements and
3013 the methodology to submit reports and format to be used, which
3014 may include an online platform.
3015 (b) In the event an entity was appropriated funds from
3016 the Education Trust Fund in the fiscal year ending September
3017 30, 2026, the entity shall also include in its report a
Page 116

30, 2026, the entity shall also include in its report a
HB238 Enrolled
3018 detailed breakdown of the expenditure and use of those funds,
3019 including an inventory of the services delivered and number of
3020 clients served, pursuant to guidelines established by the
3021 Legislative Services Agency.
3022 Section 17. The State Superintendent of Education
3023 shall notify each local superintendent and finance officer of
3024 each local education agency by email regarding the
3025 availability and application process, including any required
3026 forms, for any available grant opportunities during FY 2027.
3027 The State Superintendent shall notify all members of the local
3028 legislative delegation five days prior to the announcement of
3029 any grant made to any entity located in the legislative
3030 jurisdiction. The five days prior notice requirement shall be
3031 waived in the event of a declared emergency. The Governor
3032 shall encourage the Department to disburse the funds provided
3033 herein on a nondiscriminatory basis.
3034 Section 18. Except as may be herein otherwise
3035 provided, amounts herein specifically appropriated shall be in
3036 lieu of the amounts heretofore provided or appropriated by law
3037 for such purposes. The amounts herein appropriated are the
3038 maximum amounts to be expended for the purposes herein
3039 designated and in no event shall the maximum expenditure
3040 provided for any items of expense exceed the amount allocated
3041 herein except as may be further provided for under this act,
3042 as provided in the Budget Management Act of 1976, Sections
3043 41-19-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975, and those
3044 appropriations herein made are and shall be subject to terms,
Page 117

appropriations herein made are and shall be subject to terms,
HB238 Enrolled
3045 conditions, provisions and limitations of Sections 41-4-80, et
3046 seq., Code of Alabama 1975, and the Budget Management Act of
3047 1976, Sections 41-19-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
3048 Section 19. In addition to all appropriations
3049 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
3050 such amounts as may be necessary for public funds transferred
3051 into the State Treasury, in accordance with Executive Order
3052 No. 726.
3053 Section 20. (a) In addition to all appropriations
3054 heretofore or hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated the
3055 sum of $65,000,000 from the College and Higher Education
3056 Excellence and Results (CHEER) Fund, established by HB565 or
3057 SB344 of the 2026 Regular Session, or other act of the
3058 Legislature, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, to
3059 the eligible institutions of higher education, as follows.
3060 Alabama Community College
3061 System 24,249,379
3062 Alabama A&M University 1,560,183
3063 Alabama State University 855,071
3064 Athens State University 802,502
3065 Auburn University 7,240,506
3066 Auburn University of
3067 Montgomery 1,233,427
3068 The University of Alabama
3069 System 15,040,453
3070 Jacksonville State University 2,536,716
3071 Troy University 3,156,197
Page 118

Troy University 3,156,197
HB238 Enrolled
3072 University of Montevallo 794,756
3073 University of North Alabama 2,439,049
3074 University of South Alabama 3,129,220
3075 University of West Alabama 1,728,541
3076 Alabama Commission on Higher 234,000
3077 Education for Tuskegee
3078 University
3079 (b) The above funds shall be utilized by the
3080 institutions to serve the needs of their student population in
3081 a manner that directly supports and advances the individual
3082 performance outcome categories selected by the Outcomes-Based
3083 Higher Education Funding Coordinating Committee in a manner to
3084 result in measurable improvements in the student success
3085 factors. Provided, however, bonus funding received by premier
3086 research universities for increased research expenditures may
3087 be used for enhancing and increasing research and innovation
3088 including equipment, instrumentation, and infrastructure
3089 (e.g., hardware and software); recruiting principal
3090 investigators, graduate research students; capital projects,
3091 including renovation of existing facilities; associated
3092 operating and maintenance costs; and matching funds for
3093 federal grants and contracts.
3094 Section 21. Colleges and universities which receive
3095 Education Trust Fund appropriations shall not set
3096 per-credit-hour tuition rates for dual enrollment or early
3097 college courses below the per-credit-hour tuition rate of the
3098 Alabama Community College System institutions as adopted by
Page 119

Alabama Community College System institutions as adopted by
HB238 Enrolled
3099 the ACCS Board of Trustees annually. The Alabama Commission on
3100 Higher Education shall publish each college and university's
3101 dual enrollment tuition rates annually on their website and
3102 provide guidance to institutions to ensure compliance with
3103 this section.
3104 Section 22. Notwithstanding any other provision of law
3105 to the contrary, out of any excess revenues remaining in the
3106 Education Trust Fund from Fiscal Year 2026 that become
3107 nonrecurring revenue available for supplemental appropriation
3108 in Fiscal Year 2027 pursuant to subdivision (4) of Section
3109 29-9-4, Code of Alabama 1975, there is hereby appropriated a
3110 total of $32,900,000 from the Education Trust Fund to the
3111 Teachers' Retirement System for a one-time longevity bonus for
3112 retirees of the Teachers' Retirement System. The funds
3113 appropriated for the bonus in this section are conditioned on
3114 enactment of HB239 or SB380 during the 2026 Regular Session
3115 authorizing such bonus.
3116 Section 23. If any section, paragraph, sentence,
3117 clause, provision, or portion of this act or all or any
3118 portion of the appropriations herein made is held
3119 unconstitutional or invalid, it shall not affect any other
3120 section, paragraph, sentence, clause, provision, or portion of
3121 this act or any other appropriation or appropriations or
3122 portion thereof hereby made not in and of itself
3123 unconstitutional or invalid.
3124 Section 24. All laws or parts of laws, general,
3125 special, private, or local in conflict with or inconsistent
Page 120

special, private, or local in conflict with or inconsistent
HB238 Enrolled
3126 with the provisions of this act are hereby expressly repealed.
3127 Section 25. This act shall become effective on October
3128 1, 2026.
Page 121

1, 2026.
HB238 Enrolled
3129
3130
3131
3132
3133
3134
3135 ________________________________________________
3136 Speaker of the House of Representatives
3137
3138
3139
3140 ________________________________________________
3141 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
3142
3143
3144 House of Representatives
3145
3146 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
3147 was passed by the House 12-Mar-26, as amended.
3148
3149 John Treadwell
3150 Clerk
3151
3152
3153
3154
3155
3156 Senate 02-Apr-26 Amended and Passed
3157
3158 House 07-Apr-26 Concurred in Senate
3159 Amendment
3160
3161
Page 122